. F I R M F 0 u N D AT I 0 N ~~
I~ 1884 - - 1952
I~ Vol69, No. 31] Austin, Texas, July 29, 1952 [$3.00 Per Year in Advance National Weekly, World-Wide In Mission, Definite In Policy-the Defense ot the Ancient Gospel Dellvered to tl:ie Brlnt& Un· der Present Management t or last 43 Years. "The Finn Foundatl~ Y{ QQ.4
them that are his - 'l'lm.
~tal)feth, having thle seal: The Lord XDo-th :19 •
, ILA • =
A Difficult Conuuandment "Be not conformed to the world" is a divine commandment as essential as baptism for remission of sins. To be scrip turally baptized is futile if the one baptized lives in conformity to the world. To be conformed to the world means to subject ourselves to circumstances that a re not right.
This is incompatible with the Christian life. Paul says, "And you hath he quickened, who were dead in trespasses and sins ;
wherein in time past ye walked according to the course of this world, according to the prince of the power of the air, the spirit that now worketh in the children of disobedience" (Eph. 2: 1, 2) .
We live in the world, and naturally men are influenced by their environment. It was to the ruin of his own family that Lot chose the well watered plains of Jordan and pitched his tent toward Sodom. It looked like a good place to live, but the perverse environment destroyed his family. The man who craves material prosperity will go with the course of the world.
While it is true that man is influenced by his environment, it is also true that man has much to do in making his environment.
"Be not conformed to the world" means to refuse subjection to our own circumstances if they are not right.
Cb:ristians must rise above their evil environment and live by the will of God. No one should be the slave of his surroundings.
Human theories often make man passive in the formation of character-he has no more initiative than a toy in the hands of a child. The philosophy of fate is a ruinous ~octrine. Bot~ reason and the Bible show to man that he IS power over his own destiny. Christ traveled through this world, and it Is the disciple's duty to follow In his footsteps.
If men do this they will not be conformed to the world.
Harden Not Your Hearts G<>d does not warn men against things that cannot happen.
Some people see only one side of a thing that has two sides. Because it is said several times in the book of Exodus that God hardened Pharaoh's heart, it has been assumed that God hardened his heart arbitrarily. It is said repeatedly In the same book that Pharaoh hardened his heart. God hardened Pharaoh 's heart because he gave the law tor him to follow. Pharaoh hardened his heart because he rejected the law of God. Not just Pharaoh, but any man can harden his heart by getting on the wrong side of God's law.
Paul says, "Today if ye wlll hear his voice, harden not yonr heMls" (Heb. 3:15). The word of God Is like the sun-It hardens clay and softens wax. When one makes an adverse response to the word of God, he hardens his heart.
But the man who bears the voice of God with gladness, and ,-..,eys his commandments, makes his h eart mellow. The ..:::..
W. M. DAVIS Lord is our maker and preserver, and in him we live, move and have our being. So he has the right to reign over us.
It is his right to command us; it is our duty to obey him.
It is really alarming how many people do not want to hear what God says. They will listen to the voice of the people, the voice of conscience, or t he voice of the devil ; but close their ears to the voice of God. Jesus said of the hard hearts in Israel, "For this people's heart is waxed gross, and theh· ears Me dull of hearing, and their eyes have closed; lest at any time they should see wilh their eyes, hear with their ears, and should understand with their hearts, and should be conver ted, and I should heal them" (Matt 13 :15):
Religious Prejudice and Church History Noel Grisham (Concluded from last week) Calvin actually established no church himself. His teachings have formed a school of thought in anthropology ahd religion. Luther had no Intention of establishing a church.
He set about nobly to reform. Campbell could have founded no church. One of his main theses was that the church was one, as God and Christ are one, an41 the church of God can not exist upon the theological speculations of man but must and can exist only by the word of God, the seed of the kingdom.
He insisted that the Christian religion was of such design that it would not foster hatred and prejudice through the existing church organizations which were devlslvely sectarian.
It should be observed that Campbell's search for truth and the results of his objective studies are with refer ence to religious unity currently practiced by Northern Baptists, Methodists, Congregationalists, Disciples of Christ and sev.
eral <fther leading denominations of the North as they plan for a united church to •be called The United Church of Christ.
Dr. Hunter, formerly of Oxford University, in a r ecently pub.
lished book The Tenching of the Now Testament uses the thesis that what the New Testament actually teaches is that there is one Lord, one church, and one salvation. In reach.
ing these conclusions, Dr. Hunter makes apology for previously holding sectarian views a»d for having previously placed too much confidence In the theological conclusions of Illen. Dr. Hunter and the leading denominations of the North may awaken some day to find themselves called Oampbellltles by the Southern Baptists, who, because they do not have a scriptural name tor themselves, do not want anyone else to be called by a scriptural name. It should be obaened, however, in all fairness to both the church of ehrist and the Southern Baptist Church, tha t the attempts of the Northern churches to form a union along lines w11lch are so liberal Page Two FIRM FOUNDATION Tuesday, July 29, 1952
that they compromise truth are not the designs of the New Testament for Christian unity.
It is expected by all honest men that the Southern Baptists state their views openly and sincerely. Most members of the Southern Baptist Church wHl find themselves in a dilemma when they try to reconcile the popular opinions among Southern Baptists with the view that the Southern Baptist Church is the only church in the world of divine origin whlle all others, even the other Baptist Churches are the products of men.
It should be stated als? that the dearth of ethics manifested by the First Baptist Church of Pampa and the First Baptist Church of Vern:>n in permitting the publication of literature of such low level of name calling and distortion of historica1 facts, should not pass unnoticed.
The Southern Baptist Church will find difficulty In making Alexander Campbell the founder of both the Christian Church, the Disciples of Christ, and the church of Christ.
Before Campbell could be charged with establishing any church, it w!ll have to be shown that churches today practice anything that was originated by Mr. Campbell. Surely It Is mutually realized that If a man Is a "Campbell!te," he Is bound for hell unless he joins the Southern Baptist Church which r ecently makes the claim that It is the church which alone is of divine origin. Can the Baptists be advocating a real unity at last?
But should the Southern Baptist Church rejoice in their conclusion that John Wesley founded the Methodist Church?
The Southern Baptist Churches to which we have referred could learn a good lesson in ethics and the New Testament teaching by observing such statements made by Wesley as the following: "Would to God that all sectarian names were !orgotten, and that we, as humble, loving disciples, might sit down at the Master's feet, read his holy word, imbibe his spirit, and transcribe his life into our own." One could well encounter difficulty in finding any Methodist Church today which follows all the precepts ot John Wesley. Regardless of whatever mistakes in Interpretation which Wesley may have made; his teaching, cast in difficult days of spiritual depression, were not of such nature as to prejudice the people.
While tke Southern Baptist Church is so much concerned with the predecessors of religious people, they may be reminded that If they had any historic progenitors prior to t'he sL"<teenth and seventeenth centuries, they would be the Anabaptists who date back to Cyprian's time in the third century. The later Anabaptist groups have no connection with the Anabaptists of Cyprian's time.
There have been multitudinous controversies over the doctrine of baptism. Throughout the ages people who have found themselves at variance with the then current doctrine of baptism were susceptible to such titles as Anabaptist (rebaptizers) or Pedobaptist (for baptism of Infants).
It the Baptists Insist upon continuity, then they must b e reminded of the only people through whom by scientific historicism they could possibly find continuity. Dr. C. C. Richardson of New York's Union Theological Seminary in his book The Church Through the Ages reviews the Anabaptists at work in Munster <fflrmany. The Anabaptists drove all tbe Lutherans and Catholics who would not be forced into baptism from Munster. The Anabaptists were going to usher In the Kingdom of G<>d by force. Many were killed by the Anabaptists In this ordeal. Among the Anabaptists meaningless prophecies were uttered. Some of them believed themselves to be Christ and even God. The views of Southern Baptists today with reference to both the mode and design of baptism are not concurrent with the Anabaptists.
The Southern Baptists have much better predecessors In .'Fohn Smyth and Roger W!lliams.
The third mis-statement of facts in the prejudlce-bullding artiele which is being reviewed is this: "Go to the Encyclopedia Brittannica or to any other reputable encyclopedia, search the history of the world and you can not find any personality this side of Jesus Christ that can account for the d enomination of Christia!ls called Baptists."
Are there any personalities tJlis side of Clu-ist who can account for the "denomination of Christians called Baptists"?
Not only is there an abundance of information on lhe founders of the Baptist Church in all the encyclopedias, but also there is to be found in any of the reputable books on church history the same Information with r eference to the founders of the Baptist Church which they claim to be available only for other churches. w The tenninology denomination of Christians violates both the le tter and spirit of the Bible. The idea expressed in this terminology Is stigmatized by Paul as a work of the flesh.
Those who adhere to the doctrine of the segregation of Christians along doctrinal lines (denominationalism), declal'e Paul, shall not inhetit the Kingdom of God ( Qal. 5: 19-21).
Conservative Baptists are not willing to sanction either protestantism or denominationalism, as they r ecognize the unscriptural drives of such conclusions.
With reference to the founders of the Baptist Church, one will find more personalities than can be found in connection with other religious groups. This is possible because there are more divisions within the Baptist Church than in any other church.
The Southern Baptist Church ursurps the place of a rival Baptist Church when they claim continuity through the Anabaptist movement out of which the Mennonites became tlie first organized denomination. It is significant to observe that this group practiced foot-washing along with the Lord's supper. The only possible way tor the Baptists to find succession is through this group.
The first Baptist church was founded, according to reput- 8ible encyclopedias and according to the mos t r eputable cbut'Ch histories, in London, England by John Smyth in the year 1611. The first Baptist Church founded in America was by Roger Williams in Providence, RI., in 1683. This Baptist church had no connection with the English Baptist Church.
It should be observed that many other religious groups have come ao convictions with reference to believer's baptism as opposed to infant baptism. All who hold the view whfch caused people to be called in earlier times Anabaptists or Baptists do not at the present time sanction the title. In the true sense, tile only person who could possibly be cane·a a baptist would be one who had administered baptism himself.
The word is in the majority of instances a misnomer.
The contributors of the article which is being reviewed are referred to the following encyclopedias: Encyclopedia Ameri~ L951 edition, an encyclopedia of the highest rank; The Nelnternational Encyclopedia, published by Funk and Wagnall; Compton's Encyclopedia, 1950 Edition; Nelson's Perpetual Looseleaf EncyclopedJa., and the complete article on the Baptist Church in The Encyclopedia Brittanniea.
The following data from these encyclopedias repudiate the claim that reputable encyclopedias do not reveal personalities which can account for the Baptist Church's establisli.ment: The Encyclopedia America, Vol. 3, reveals under the title Origin and Early History of the Baptists that John FIRM FOUNDATION Published Weekly by the Firm Found&·
tlon P ublishing Bouse, Austin, Texas, G. H. P. Showalter, Editor.
Subscription Rates: 1 Year --------------------------$ 3.00
fo Y.;~!~s -:=::::::::===:::=:::::=:=::-..:::::::::=:::: 1~gg Clubs ot 6 or more, each ------------------------ 2.00
Entered aa second-claaa matter April, 1886, at the Post Ott!ce at Austin, T exaa, under act ot March 3, 1879.
Ortlce oC PubllceUon. 3110 Guadalupe Street, Awatln, Texaa.
Advertising rates sent upon request.
FIRM FOUNDATION PUBLISHING HOUSE 8110 G\ladalupe Street, Auatln, Texas :uesday, July 29, 1952 FIRM FOUN'DATION Page Three Smyth and thirt)"-six adherents formed a new church on the principle of baptizing believers only. He baptized himself by applying water to his head, and then baptized the other thirty-six in similar fashion. Arter some Investigation, Smyth decided that the Mennonites constituted a genuine church of God, and he recommended union with them. In March 1639, Roger Williams was baptized by Ezekiel Holliman, and then Holliman baptized others. This was the first Baptist Church organized in America. A letter from Roger Williams to John Winthrop of England ten years after the formation of the church mentioned the recent introduction of "a new baptism and the manner of dipping." After founding the first Baptist Church in America, Roger Williams "withdrew from the Baptist group, and classified himself a 'Seeker,' awaiting the re-establishment of the true church through a new apostolic dispensation" {Vol. 3, page 221).
In May, 1845, a convention representing the Baptist hurches of the South me t at Augusta, Georgia, and formed the South~n Baptist Convention. The Southern Baptist Churches withdrew from the General Missi~nary Convention over the question of slavery and other matters. Many changes between the Northern and Southern Baptist Churches have been effected. In fact, at the present time, there Is little similarity in the two groups.
The oth-er encyclopedias to which reference was made contain abundance of information which concurs with the data presented from the new edition of the Americana.
Reputable encylopedias and reputable church histories reveal the following personalities who have made possible the existence and founding of the Baptist Church: Menno Simons, John Smyth, Helwigs who wrote the first Baptist creed, The Declaration of Faith fNeve, Churches and Sects of Christendom, page 515), James Armenius, John Calyin, and Roger Williams.
It must not be overlooked that the Baptists of the present time who have the stronger arguments for succession back to the Mennonites growing out of the Anabaptist Movement are the Baptists who practice foot-washing.
If the data presented in this essay are Incorrect, It Is because reputable encyclopedias and reputable church hlstorles have failed to shed the proper light. It Is admitted that church histories are very susceptible to subjectivism. It Is not intended that this article should cause the Southern Baptists to despair. They should avoid the publication a ntl circulation of literature which Is so manifestly Incorrect, and therefore apt to prejudice the members of the Southern Baptist Churches who may regard such literature as if It were factual. It is hoped' that a genuine faith In God through Christ through the Scriptures will cause all men to seek a solution for their religious differences through discussion, ra~ lonallty, and good will.
Studies in Ephesians (No. 15)
R. C. Bell The second half of Ephesians Is a long exhortation to move Christians to "walk worthily of" their eternal calUng.
Observe how this half of the book with Its "therefores" leans back on the first hal!. Paul knows that after Christians appreciate "the glory of God's grace" and "the unsearchable riches of Christ," exhorting will be effective. To lead saints Into deeper underetanding and appreciation of the goodness of p-od, as Ephesians does, Is a far better way to keep dancing, drlnk-lng, fornicating, and such like out of the church today than is melodramtic preaching and wrltlng about these sins.
Bei.1aJ. and Mammon "But fornication • . . or covetousness, let It not be named among you . • . nor fUthlness, nor foolish talking or j usting" ( Eph. 5: 3, 4). The closely allied sins of fornications and covetousness, "the lust of property;• grow out of trying to fulfill life by means of fleshly gratification. In the Bible and in life they are often found together. Milton describes Belial: "Than whom a Spirit more lewd tell not from heaven, or more gross to love vice for Itself"; and Mammon:
"The least erect Spirit that fell from hea"1!en .. . his looks ... always downwBird bent, admiring ... Heaven's (golden) pavement." Both fornicators and covetous men are Idolaters, "whose end is perdition, whose god is the belly ... who mind earthly things" {Phil. 3: 19). Idolatry is possible without Images.
"Foolish talking"-senseless prating and frivolous chatter of dull men. "Jesting"-smutty jokes and wanton banter of clever men. Christ's "idle word" suggests an idle boy sauntering about without direction or purpose. None of this indecency and aimlessness, bred and augmented by idleness and evil company, befit the earnestness and elevation of Christians, who must not "wound modesty." How few the grains of gold in the sand that streams through our lips; how easy to throw our brains Into neutral and let the tongue idle on. "Ofttimes the best command of language Is silence."
This passage contains a warning against "empty words.,.
Wicked men invent false reasons to justify ''the works of th& flesh." Knowing nothing of Christian temperance and moderation, they say such natural propensities as sex and the acquisition of wealth cannot be sinful; they argue, since Christians are under grace, not law, and since God's grace is sufficient to cover all sins, they may continue to sin with impunity. But all such imposing on God's goodness and turning his grace into lasciviousness, Paul blasts with: "Let no man deceive you with empty words; for because of these thin,gs (all moral fllth) cometh the wrath of God upon th& sons of disobedience" ( 5: 6). . • ..:..:i Darkness Becomes Light The change that becoming a Christian makes in one's lite Is again vividly portrayed. It is transition from darkness into light, without twilight. "Be not ye therefore partakers with them; for ye were once darkness, but now are light in the Lord: walk as children of the }ight {for the f·ruit of the light is in all goodness and righteousness and truth)
. . . and have no fellowship with the unfruithful works of darkness, but rather even reprove them . .. " (6:7-17).
When Christians come out of the darkness tnto the light and, exhibiting the triad, "all goodness and righteousness and truth (sincerity)," live clean lives, they need make little special effort to avoid compromising economical, soeial, or religious entanglements with those who remain in the darkness, for darkness cannot abide light. The world, with its life "alienated from the lite of God," has no use for Christians who challenge its way of life, and consequently will avoid them rather than the other way round.
Chdstians cannot be indolent and neutral, merely harmless, but, realizing that to kill time is to injure eternity, they wisely work and are aggressively positive, "redeeming the time." They should never be unemployed nor triflingly employed.
And as darkness is overcome by light In the physical realm, so moral darkness, made manifest and shown up in Its true colors by the sea.rchlight of Christianity, is recognized for what it Is, and Is overcome. The scripture characterizes saints and give them their work and purpose in the world.
"Filled With the Spirit" From the time of ancient Troy, the Inhabitants e>f A11la Minor had been a lighthearted, con'Vivial race. To Ettllesus, the capital of Asia Minor, Paul writes: "Be not drunken wltb wine ... but be filled with the Spirit" { 6:18). This sceiable people, who had once found excitation and animation in wine and carnal fellowship, are now to find these tbings in .:··.·:.
Page Four FIRM FOUNDATION Tuesday, July 29, 19&-..
the Holy Spir it and spiritua l fellowship. As vegetation and · animals ch ange with altitude , so coming to Christ lifts men to h ighe r levels where " Old things are passed away ; behold, they are become n ew" ( 2 Cor. 5: 17) .
From the fact tha t instead of " Filled with the Spirit," a companion verse Col. 3: 16, has "Let the word of Christ dwell in you r ichly," some have concluded th at the Holy Spirit and the word of Christ a re the same thing. Inasmuch as it is impossible for Christians to be f illed with the Spirit unless they a re full of the word too, the two expressions mean , practically, the same t h ing. It does not follow, however, t'hat the Holy Spirit and his wor d , which is h is word ( 6: 17)
are identical any more than a soldier and his sword are identical. As this sold ier s upplements h is sword with other weapons to do things a sword cannot do, so the Holy Spirit .
for the same reason, s upplement s h is sword.
Instead of teach ing tha t the Holy S pirit and the word are the same , or even that the Spirit d wells i n t he wor d. E ph. 3:16 teach es t h at the Spirit d wells in sa ints to strengthen them wHh power in t he inward man. And R om. 8 : 2 6 says:
" The Spirit himself mak eth in te rcession for us with groanlugs that cannot be u ttered." The manner of the Holy S pirit's inward wor king transcends the power of language t o describe, for it cannot be put in to words at all. Be it "known, however, that the Spirit never works in contradiction :to, but a lways in cbn junction with h is written word . Do men live a nd d ie as Paul lived and died, unless th ey believe a s u perhuman power t hat overcomes sin and death works within them? We miss too mu ch when we forget that the power of Christianity, from P entecos t onward, comes to focus "in the power or the Holy Spirit," as h e strengthens t tie inward ma n down to s ubsconscious d epths. The Bible is not God.
Judas Iscariot By Frank L. Cox "Then the lust, when it h ath conceived. beareth s in: and the sin . whe n it is fullg rown. br ingeth forth death" (J ames 1:15) .
Judas was once an infan t in the arms of a fond moth er .
Were it not for the evil association, his name would be bea utiful : for ·it means "Thanksgiving." He mus t h ave playerl with other little boys on th e s treets of Kerioth. His taughter must have been as merry and as innocent as theirs.
Like other young men. he mus t have d reamed d reams and seen fair visions. Then into his life came J esus of Nazar et h.
The kind invitation was s poken, "Follow me." Judas arose and followed.
From that day onward he sh ould h ave grown in gr ace, as he gr ew in knowledge of the Savior: but he d eveloped in the wr ong direction. After meeling the Master a man is never the same. Ir he does not become be tter, he will become worse: for Ch•r is t. or his word. is either " a savor of life unto life or of death unto death." The steps of the tragic rt escent are given by J ames : "Then the lust , when It hath conceived, beareth s in , and th e sin, when it is fullgrown, bringeth forth death."
· Somewhere in the Orient there is a tree which bears a 'crimson blossom before putting forth Its foliage. The flower Is so deadly that the bees In s ea r ch for sweetness dipping into it fa ll dead. The f r uit of the tree iil a gall-apple which, .. fully ri pe, Is filled with bit t er dus t . It h as been nttingly :called "The Judas-tree," and provides an apt illus tr ation of . the self-propagating power of evil- the blossom, the fruit, and t-he a shes.
I. Tho Blossom · An evil life has· its beginning in lus t . In the sacr ed scriptures the word "lust" means an inordina te d esire of any k ind. This we shall call the blossom of t he Judas-tree. 1. It may be the beginning of sens uality, the intense desire for pleasure. John calls it "the lust of the fl esh."
The sensualist is on e who lives under the domin a tion of his senses. His aim, his watchword is self-gratification. The Greeks of old had a temple of pleasure (Bacchus ) which was entered by a magnif icent door where lights gleamed and minis trels made music. But in the r ear of the building was a wicket-gate which open ed into a swine-yard , or "a hog pen," as we would say. The bacch ana l was th rust forth, str ipped and despoiled, in to shame and con tempt . His substances was ted, he sat in solitude among filthy beasts. This is s uggestive. The end of sens uality is not s a tisfaction, but humiliation . 9 Lust may be a n inordinate desire for ear thly honor or power or recog nition. Many n oble hearts are v uln era b~ just here. No passion of the soul is so insatiable as "~
pride of life." For the love of a crown, vilest d eeds have been perpe tra ted. For fea r of losing a crown King Saul t r ied to kill young David. To gain a crown and t he glory and the power connected the r ewith Absalom r ebelled against his father. Of the sixty- two emper ors from Caesar to Constan t ine. fo r ty-t wo wer e murdered through j ealousy for a cr own. The d esire to rule , to control , to d omin a te, to be elevated t o a position above one's fellows i s a form of worldliness no less sinful and degrading than "the lust of t he fl esh."
The honor and the glory and the praise that come f rom the sons of men have never brought s atis faction t o a human soul. 3. Or lust may be a consuming d esire for mone y. This J ohn calls "the lust of the eyes." It is sa id of Judas that " he carried the bag." There is no good r eason for saying that money of itself is evil. Bu t the love of it is a root of ail k inds of e vil. Paul makes this very clear ( 1 Timothy 6 : 1 0 ).
"Gold! gold ! gold! gold!
Brigh t a nd yellow, h ard and cold ;
Molten. gr aven, hammer ed , and r olled ;
Heavy to get and ligh t to hold Hoarded. barte r ed , bought, and sold , Stolen . borrowed, squand er ed, d oled; Spurned by the young, but hugged by the old To th e very verge of the churchyard mold ;
P r ice of many a crime untold :
Gold ! g old ! gold! gold!
Good or bad a thousand fold!
How widely its agencies vary, To save, t o r uin, to curse, to bless.
As ever its minted coins express, Now s tamped with the image of good Queen Bess, And now of bloody Ma ry.'
Wheth er our money sh all br ing a blessing or a curse to ourselves and to oth er s , depends on the way we us it. "Mon ey will k inrlle a ! ire to warm the blue hands of poverty, or to burn up tru th. virt ue, love, and all the noble passions of the heart. Money w ill provide bread for the widow and the fatherless, or glut the soul and body with brutish vices.
Money. if r ightly used, will make the wilderness of this world blossoms like a rose, or , if wrongly used . will scorch the gr een est meadows and blight the fairest garden. He is but a poor student of human nature who has n ot observed the t endencey of glowing wealth to d estroy the nobler life of the soul." The Master sa id, " It is easier for a camel to go through the eye of a needle than for a rich man to enter the kingdom of God.''
II. The F'ruit The na t ural consequences of an inordinate d esire is sintransgression of divine law. This is the fruit of the Juda:
'l'uesday, July 29, 1 ~52 FIRM FQUNDATION Page Five tree. "Then the lust, when it bath conceived, bringeth forth sin." Out of the upper 1
room hastened Judas, with the taste of the fruit or the vine on his lips. Straight to the Hall Gazith h11 went. There he bargained with the Jewish leaders to betray Jesus for thirty pieces of silver, the legal price of a slave.
"When," they asked him, "wilt thou deliver him into our bands?"
"This very night," replied the traitor.
"Where?" asked the leaders.
"At this very moment he is on his way to the Garden of the Olive-press, on the slope of Olivet. I know the place well, for he is accustomed to resort thither for prayer and meditation. I will guide you."
TheY. set forth-the guards, the rulers, and the mo:b with words and staves and torches. Judas was out in front. He 1 them at a quiet pace down the path to Kedron, and up the slope of the opposite hill. They entered the garden.
There Judas turned and said: "Whomsoever I shall kiss, the same is he. Hold him fast." Th~y passed on until they came to the grove of the Oil-press. In the dim light of the moon they saw him yonder. Judas, rushing headlong to ruin, drew near and threw his arms about him, saying, "Hail, Master!" Then he kissed him. He kissed him mu~h --over and over. In that kiss his crime reached a climax.
It marked a sin against light, a sin against love, a sin against warning. It was a treacherous act! A crime more horrible we cannot imagine.
Judas loved money. This made him a thief. This made him an ingrate. This made him a treacherous person. This caus~d him to turn against his best friend. Judas was not a sensualist-the sin of fornication or of drunkeness or of gluttony is not charged against him. He was npt especially ambitious--no charge of this nature is made against him. He did not need to be a sensualist or an ambitious person. He was covetous and this sin damned his soul.
' 111. The Ashes "And the sin, when it is fullgrown, bring:s forth death."
This is the gall-apple, the bitter fruit of the Judas-tree. In the remaining moments, we catch a few glimpses of his wretched face. First, we see him wandering about in the darkness of that dreadful night. He Is alone. His sin had driven him away from his Master and fellow - disciples.
A Complete Course of Study on AUL'S LATER LIFE AND LETTERS A Work·book in Thirteen Lessons Including a Study of I TIMOTHY- TITUS- II TIMOTHY For All Ages Especially from Junior High School Age and Up, Sunday Morning Classes, Young People's Meetings, Sunday Evening Classes, Mid-week Study, Ladies Bible Classes, Home Study, Vacation Bible School.
One to five copies __________________ 35c per copy Six or more copies __________________ 30c per copy ORDER FROM: FIRM FOUNDATION PUBLISHING HOUSE P. 0. Box 77, Austin, Texas Plnnt: 3110 Gundnlupe Street Austin, Texa•
.-c _ ll _ D _ O_CI_CI _O....M_ _ ..._.__,_,__ _,_ _________
~·
Second, at the doorway of the Hall Gazlth, where the rabbis are In session. With the pathetic reply, "1 have betrayed Innocent blood!" he hurls the money down upon the noor.
Before the sin, he thought only of the gain; after the sin, he despised the gain and thought only of his sin. He hurrJe~ out again into the darkness. The last scene is a rope and a suicide's dishonored grave_. Well might his tomb (If he has a tomb) bear this inscription: "SIN, WHEN IT IS FULLGROWN, BRINGETH FORTH DEATH."
"Let him that thinketh he sta ndeth, take heed lest he fall." Judas tried to follow the Lord and to CarTy his sinthe sin of covetousness-with him. The tragedy followed, The only way to escape sin and Its consequences is to beware of the beginning of it and to love the Lord supremely. 404 W. Kilpatrick St reet, Mineola, Texas.
Harding College Students Work With the Deaf Royal H. Bowers In the late fall of 1945, Sam Roach entered Arkansas School for the Deaf. The following August he was converted to Christ. As he learned more about God and what he would have him to do, he became deeply interested in working with the deaf people.
' A year after he was converted, a Bible class for the deaf was formed at the Hh and State Streets church In Little Rock, which has since moved to its new building on 6th and Izard Streets. They secured an interpreter to interpret while Cleon Lyles did the teaching. The attendance was good the first year.
The next three years were discouraging because of a~ inadequate program and insufficient cooperation in the work. The deaf met at the Central church on 13th and Wolfe Streets during this time. Cly,de Van Cleve and Bro. Roach worked. with them there.
Last July the deaf moved to the Pulaski Heights congrega..
tion because this location was better situated for the deaf work from the viewpoint of transportation for the adult deaf as well as its being nearer the deaf school. The next month Bro. Roach began his regular work with the deaf. His association with the deaf as a student in school has given him a broader and better understanding of the deaf and how they feel and think.
In J anuary, 1950, Bro. Roach started ·a sign language class to prepare others to work with the deaf. In the beginning the class met in the apartment of Bro. & Sister Roach in Vet Village just off the Harding Campus. Sister Roach and one student from College, Bob Anderson, were Bro. Roach's first pupils. The class has grown to about 20 and now meets on~ night a week in a class room of the Administration building.
There are seven girls in the group. The names of those other than the ones already mentioned are: Bebe Daniels, Joan Hayes, Anne Bradke, Joyce Eggers, Irma Coons, Ruth Walker, John Spickler, Charles J ordan, Margaret Brown, Jim Maxwell, Mike Moore, Harold Romine, Gene Robinson, John Moor e, Les Richesin, Delma r Browning, Russel McNalty, and Gerald Long.
A la rge number of t his class are interested in some phase of the deaf work and it is hoped more will d ecide to lwbo;r in this field in the future.
Two of these students, Bob Anderson and Gene Robinson, are planning to look into the possibilities of starting the deaf work in Chicago this summer and try to prepa re the way for a deaf congr egation t here. Another student, Harold Romme, is planning to do a similar work in Kansas. He has already decided to work full time with t he deaf after he graduates from Harding. He and Bob Anderson have been g oing to Little Rock regular aly this school year wit\J. Bro. & Sister Page Six FIRM FOUNDATION Tuesday, July 29, 1952
Roach and have taken part in the work there, helping to prepare themselves for this work with the deaf. Others who have gone a great deal of the time are Babe Daniels and Mike and John .Moore.
The students mentioned will be capable of carrying on the tdeaf work wherever they may g~ after graduation. and nlso ·will be able to start sign language clnsses !n which to teach :and train other hearing people to work w:th the denf.
The work with the deaf in Little Rock this year has had 'Some very encouraging events. The first contact there resulted in 2 conversions and it was made shortly after Robert Regan of Dallas, Texas, came to Little Rock for an operation. He stayed with his mother 2 or 3 months and Brother and Sister Roach and others conducted a Bible Class for him (and his wife who spent 2 or 3 weeks there) every Sunday af ternoon a t the Regan's home until he was able to attend services. Shortly after his r eturn to Dallas, a deaf congregation was started there and both Robert and his wife were baptized.
Since about January this year Robert's brother, Dennis, and his wife (neither is a member of the church) have been attending our services in Little Rock regularly Sunday morning and evening.
·One other result of the work has been the restoration of one of the girls attending the deaf school.
The deaf people have been neglected almost entirely by the church of our Lord; however, the denominations have been very busy in this field-both white and colored deaf. The brotherhood is doing very little to encou1·age and support this great work. Can they answer this question, "Why are the deaf being neglected?"
Perhaps the basic reason is that the brethren have failed to make an effort to understand the deaf people, and therefore, haven't been very interested in trying to help them. A very large percentage of the brethren seem to think more of themselves than of the Lord's work in can-ying out the great commission. For proof, take a look at our foreign mtss1ons. And even those far-seeing breth1·en who have vision for foreign missions have failed to turn that vision toward the deaf field-which is "even now white unto harvest."
The opportunities of saving lost souls among the deaf are numerous and the door is open wide. The church of our Lord ~hould not overlook this great need.
In a recent article in the Arkansas Gazette, Dr. Theodore R.
Van Dellen Wiites, "One in 20 persons is said to be hard of hearing." He further states, "With intelligent management the hearing of many is restored within s erviceable limits."
But what about the many many others who are left dependent upon the sign language to communicate with one another?
Who will take the gospel to them? Luke 10:2; John 4:35.
Joseph W. White To Head Pepperdine Religion Department Hugh l\1. Tiner President, Pepperdlne College As Pepperdine College enters its s ixteenth academic year, 13everal changeQ have been effected in the Department of Religion. Effective September 1, 1961, W. B. West. Jr., who !for eight years directed thf:l Department, res igned and joined the starr of Harding College as head or the Relig ion Department there.
Since Dr. West's resignation, I have been acting head of the Pepperdine Religion Department. But because of the constant press or my duties as president of Pepperdine, I have been unable to devote as much of my time as I would have liked toward directing the department. Performing most of the administrative duties or the department has been Brother Joseph W. Wllite, who began teaching at Pepperdlne in 1940.
It gives me genuine plt~asure at this time to announce that ertective June 1, 1962, Brother White wlll take over the Religion Department, succeeding Brother West and relieving me of my additional responsibility toward the department.
Brother· White will be the third man to head the department, Brother J. P. Sanders having held the position during the years 1937 to 1942.
In turning the Religion Department here at Pepperdlne over to Brother White, we are confident of having chosen a man fully capable of discharging the grave responsibilities accompanying such a position.
It has ever been and will continue to be the purpose of our department to teach the word of God in its fullness and to shape the minds of youth along lines of useful service based on a foundation of sound teaching. We are proud of the record of our Religion Department through the year and we are confident it will continue to grow In numbc..
and in stature with Brother White as its head.
Brother White has been a scholar of the Bible his entire life and has preached for many years. His father before him was one of the most respected preachers In the brotherhood and he Imparted to his son those qualities of firmness and leadership so essential In these days of stress to be practiced by those In pos;tions commanding respect and authority.
Brother White's particular academic field has been In the a rea of Bible history. He has discovered through years of patient research many valuable and vital facts relating to early Biblical manuscripts. In addition to this, of course, he has diligently pursued many other studies relating to religion and its teaching In this crucial age.
Constantly pursuing his research, Brother White has become especially interested in church progress during the last 100 years. He Is presently preparing for publication a book concerned primarily with church history since 1906.
As part of his research he has studied with care many publications sponsored by members of the church In this country, tracing the growth of the church throughout the United States.
Brother White has been minister of the Santa Monica Church of Christ for six years. In his new capacity at Pepperdlne, he will continue his active preaching.
Brother White Is a son of the late L. S. White, remembered as one or the pioneers of local work in Texas. The elder White, who died in 1949, began his local preaching in 1906 in Dallas, Texas, and was recognized as a major innuance in increasing and building the church to its present strength in the Southwest.
Accompanying this announcement Is Brother White's own statement defining his plans and ambitions for the Rellglo.~~o,.
Department at Pepperdine. It is assured these plans " '
be found to be in harmony with the ideals of Chrl!lt and the ideals of Pepperdine College.
Plans For The Pepperdine Bible Department Joseph W. White In connection with the announcement of my apointment as head of the department of religion of P epperdine College, no doubt many will be interested in our plans. It might be well to state here that the present title, "Department of Religion,"
has been used Cor a number of years, but the courses taught are, in general, those taught in the Bible departments of other schools. In fact, most persons here refer to it as "the Bible Department." Consideration is being given to a change in the title. since some might think that we are interested in teaching Christianity as only one religion among many. We are interested In no such thing. We bell that Christianity is God's only revealed truth.
Tuesday, July 29, 1952 FIRM FOUNDATION PageSena We do not want to become a "preacher factory." No college can make a gospel preacher. However, the right sort of instruction and training can help to a better understanding of God's word and a more efficient use of one's talents. Our curriculum within the department Is being reshaped in order to better secure these results. I have no hesitancy in stating frankly that we hope to offer those courses, and teach them in s uch a manner as will in the most practicable way help our preacher boys to serve churches of Christ. While we would like for our boys to become true scholars, we do not desire to make what the world calls theologians or philosophers.
We simply want to do our part toward helping them become sound gospel preachers.
Our courses will be grouped under three heads: Bibllcal, Contextual, and Practical. Of the thlrty.six hours required of our majors, at least twenty must be in the Biblical field.
Certainly, no person is qualified to preach unless he kno-ws the w-ord of God. The Contextual field includes those background studies whick are needful in order to grasp the setting of the Bible. This area will offer such courses as ~ography of Bible Lands, Church History, Archaeology, the Ancestry of the English Bible, and the like. The Practical area embraces such subjects as Sermon Preparation and Delivery, the Educational Work of the Church, Personal Evangelism, and Counseling.
Doctrine will be taught from the word of God, not from artificial theological and "doctrinal" courses. Every teacher In the department Is also a preacher. All but one of them are preaching regularly for local congregations. They are not mere theorists. The following men, and perhaps others, will teach In the d epartment during the next session: Robert Broadus, Hubert Derrick, James <!:. Dixon, S. H. Hall, Morgan Harlan, Mlchlo Nagai, Wade Ruby, Herman Wilson, and myself.
To furth er the ends we have in view, our graduate department wlll be de-emphasized and continued on a small scale, If at all. We wlll concentrate on doing a good job in the undergraduate department. In addition to our own departmental work, we are planning to ~llrect our majors Into those courses in other departments which wlll be of most value to them.
One final, personal word. The position of head of this department offers a great challenge for service, but at the same time it entails a great responsibility. I deeply appreciate the friends, within and without the school, who have sought my appointment. I am grateful for the blessed privIlege of having devoutly Christian parents, who were intensely loyal to the church. My father preached the unsearchable riches of Christ for more than fifty years. He knew the Bible, loved the Bible, and preached the Bible. He taught me to love God, love the Bible, love the church, and to love people, especially the brethren. I have done none of these things perfectly, but each one of them Is my goal. I try to Inculcate these principles in my students. Every teacher ln the department Is expected to do the same thing. We hope to be able to say that every student who majors In this department will leave Pepperdine College with a greater love for God, the Bible, the church, and humanity, than he had when he came to us. To that end we seek your prayers, your counsel , your fraternal cooperation and, If we merit it, your patronage.
Weems to Pepperdine Joseph W. White A great many persons wili be interested in learning that Brother Eddie Weems, who left a year and one-half ago to give a closer personal attention to his ranch, will return to George Pepperdine College beginning with the fa ll semest er of 1952. While he will teach some classes in English and wlll continue his great love, track coaching, his main interest will be In ~aching several intro-ductory Bible classes. In a personal letter to me Brother Weems stated that he cons iders the large Bible classes he taught here to 'be the finest work of bis life.
Brother Weems needs no introduction to the brotherhoo-d, particularly in the Southwest. A, great host of fine preachers in Texas and the surr~unding terrttory have enjoyed studying the Bible under hls guidance during the years he taught at Abilene Christian College. The administration of George Pepperdine College and the Department of Religion are very happy at his return. Everyone who is acquainted with Brother Weems, knows that he has an unswerving loyalty to the Bible and the church. Hi6 plain, direct, sincere approach has endeared him to thousands. We know that he will give added strength to our Bible department and be a great source of good to the cause of Christ on the West coast. In addition to his teaching in the college, he will be busy preaching on Sundays.
A VALUABLE BOOK Never in the history of the church in America. has there been a. book published that contained the lives of our elders and deacons. We are planning such a book or books, dividing the nation into sections and listing the names accordingly.
Inactive elders and d eacons will be entered as well as the acti:ve. There will be a separate volume for those who have gone to be with the Lord. The cost for each entry will be $3 whlch will entitle him to a book.
Additional books. based upon the same id'ea, will be published on song leaders and teachers and another book or boo_ks on great women of the church both living and dead.
Histories of churches will be published in a large and very expensive book and the stories will be much longer. The cost of this book will be more and there will be an addit1011al charge for a full-page picture of the building.
Please contact James L. Lovell, editor of California Christian, 5640 Valley Glen Way, Los Angeles 43, Callfornia, for further information.
Adult classes, or high school classes could hardly do beCiter than to order a supply of "'You Can Do Personal Work" for a three of four months' study for the entire clas8. QaJte a number of teachers have directed classes through the study of this book. 'Pry it.
RESERVATION ORDER For the greater convenience of some of our readers we are extending the following reservation order form.
diM "THINGS TO CONSIDER" Just fill in your name and correct post office address, out out and mail to Fi·rm Foundation, P. 0. Box 77, A!ustln, Texas, and a copy will be r eserved for you to be mailed promptly when the book is ready for mailing, and remittance can be mailed upon recsipt of llhe book, at pre-publication price.
PLEASE RESERVE A COPY FOR ME: NAME STREET or RFD - - - --- -------- --------------------POST OF~CE - --- ---------------- STATE------------
Page Eight FIRM FOUNDATION Tuesday, July 29~ 1952
EDITORIAL BEACON HIL~AN ANTONIO, TEXAS It was my good pleasure on Lord's day, July 20th, to preach morning and evening for the Beacon Hjll Church of Christ in San Antonio. This was a "supply" engagement for Brother Cecil E. Hill, who is out for some two or three weeks in evangelistic meetings.
It was my pleasure to meet quite a number of people whom I have known in former years. In the early days of the work in San Antonio, I preached nearly all over the city in the effort to plant the cause of Christ. These appointments were at Denver Heights, South FWres, Beacon Hill and some other points. There are now twelve congregations of Am~-
. icans, besides one Negro and one Mexican congregation.
The Jefferso:. Street church and West Avenue are two of the latest. Both are starting off in a fine way and have the buildings arranged on their lots in a way to accommodate a larger main auditorium later.
The brethren at Beacon Hill deserve favorable mention for the fine work they have accomplished in days gone. From their membership have gone out several groups of members to become the nucleus or beginning of new congregations. With all that, th~~
still have a large membership and are growing. One fine brother placed his membership at the morning service. The new building ef the Beacon Hill church is now complete and affords convenience for the regular appointments of the church. The old building, a substantial stone structure, is still in use for classes in the regular Lord's day Bible school.
On January 20, 1952, the Beacon Hill Church of Christ began worshiping in its new and much larger auditorium, just east of the old building on Magnolia at Grant. After about four years of having two services conducted each Sunday morning, all members of the congregation can now meet in the same assembly.
The new auditorium will seat about seven hundred.
It is constructed of buff -colorea brick t ile supported by fifty-four tons of steel. Besides the sanctuary, the building contains a sixty-foot foyer across the entire front, a large nursery, two classrooms, utility rooms, dressing rooms, three r est rooms, church offices, anll considerable storage space. Rose colored walls a~d multi-st ained window glass blend to produce a rosy glow and cheerful atmosphere in the a udit orium. Dignity without pret entiousness is achieved through the use of deep maroon aisle carpeting of highest quality, mahogany paneling from f loer t o ceiling behind the rostrum-broken by an arched opening for the raised baptistry, and solid oak f urniture of massive yet simple lines. The entire 'building is simple in its architectural design, and the congregation has received many commendations for both the simplicity and beauty of its new church home.
Cost of the building and furnishings was about $125,-
000. The program was financed chiefly by selliDg $65,000 worth of Broadway Plan Bonds. The co:D..
gregation contributed $35,000 last year and hopes to do that well again this year.
The Beacon Hill congregation gave about $10,000 in cash and around one hundred and fifty memberP to the new West Avenue congregation about eight.
een months ago. Also a number of members were lost to another new congregation in Alamo Heights.
Although the present membership is now less than four hundred, a rapid growth is expected. Many have been added to the congregation during the two months since completion of the building. Last week one was restored and seven placed membership.
This congregation is about thirty years old and is in its third building. The second building was completed in 1926 and will continue to serve as an educational building for a few years. Present plans are to remove the old building as soon as possible to make room for a large annex to be used for the Bible school For several years the congregation has given much thought and preparation to its teaching program with the thought of developing the best Bible school possible.
'L. L. Maxwell, one of the elders and a school principal, has charge of the educational efforts of the congregation, and it is believed that a large measure of efficiency has been accomplished in this work. The church is blessed with a number of excellent teachers.
The elders of the Beacon Hill congregation are J.
Frank Boles, Stuart Bergman, and L. L. Maxwell.
The deacons are H. C. Pape, Leonard Haller, R. M.
Holmes, G. S. Sawyer, R. A. Stark, C. C. Sturm an~ Dr. E. A. Maxwell. Cecil E. Hill is now in his six:t!.
year as minister.
THE LATEST Al\'D BEST SONG BOOKS FOR THE CHURCHES AND PROTRACTED MEETINGS "New Wonderful Songs,'' Muslin Copy, 65c; Doz. $7.80; 100, $66.00
"New Wonde r fu l Songs," cloth Copy, 75c; Doz. $9.00; 100, $75.00
"Our Leader" ---- ----- __ copy, 35c; Doz. $4 .20; 100, $35.00
"New Ideal Hymn Book," cloth Copy, 75c; Doz. $9.00; 100, $75.00
"New Ideal Hymn Book," Muslin Copy, 65c; Doz. $7.80; 100, $65.00
"Greater Gospel Songs," cloth Copy, 60c; Doz. $7.20; 100, $ 60.00
"Songs of The Reapers, No. 2" Copy, 15c; Doz. $1.80; 100, $12.50
"SDN THEORY," Rudiments o! Mus ic Copy, 35c; Doz. $4.20 ; 100, $35.00
FIRM FOUNDATION PUBLISHING HOUSE Box 77-Austln, Texas.
.&Uesday, July 29, 1952 FIRM FOUNDATION FROM THE HARVEST FIELD Le'Vo7 BlvenJJ, Box 734, Ga dsden, Ala bama, July H: One ba ptized a t Central yes terday.
Our vacation Bible school begins on the 28th o! this month. Brother J. B. Cox wiJI ass is t us In this school. Our work In g e neral progresses In a splendid manner.
C. J . Klrk:Pntrlck, Fifth Avenue at Beechweod Boulevard, P ittsburgh G, P ennsylvania, July 14: We have had two baptisms s ince opening our new building. The s trikes have serious ly hindered a ll the c on greg a tions her e.
g r egotlon In Carlsba d, New Mex ico, where Roy P rie s t preaches and In Seminole, ,T exas, where Herman Ne lli serves as evangelist.
Both o! these men are doing a fine work and It was a pleasure to have t h em as cola bor e rs In these meetings. I promised to r e turn to both pla ces tor s imilar e!!orts.
Jnme• E. ;Laird, 36 Piedmont, Charleston, South Carolina , July 15: Since last r ep ort, nine have p laced member ship, one r estored.
T h e re were 139 In B ible s tudy last Lord's day and $179.65 c on t ribution. W hen In Cha rlesto n, worship with us .
Fred A.. TnUey, Kingman, Arizona , July Page Nine c. R. Nichol r ecently conduct e d meetings wi th Capitol Hill congregation, J ackson, Mississippi, June 1-16; the church In Dothan, Ala b a ma, June 16-26; and Mar ie tta , Georg ia, J u ne 26-July G.
Jnme• M. Ben,on, Box 6&8, R oute 6, P ensacola, Florida, July 16: A Ba ptis t school teacher w a s baptized r ecen tly at Cross R oad. The F erry Pass meeting r e sulted In t hree baptisms. I b egin at Wald, Ala bama, July 20, the n back t o Pen sacola. !or a meetIng at North Brow nsville, Aug us t ~ .
Tllllt s. Teddlle, Box 336, Ennis , Texas, July 17: Two have been ba ptized h ere this month. I began a meeting at Kemp, Texas, last night. One young ma n was baptized a t tho firs t service. I s hall hold a meeting a t Cla r endon, T exas , August 26 through Sept ember 2. The Interest and attendance Is very good despite the hot summer w eathlo)'
d D. FIUUlJnJ~;, Snyder, T exas , July 14:
e Sny d er church will conduc t a meeting Aug us t 1-10, with Ira A. Do u thitt preachIng and Pleasant Cre nshaw directing singIng.
Since last r eport w e h a ve had 12 baptisms, 13 res torations and 11 to place membership.
H: Yest erday was a g ood day with us h ere er.
a t K1n gma n. We had a number ot visitors Fronk L. Cox, Box 104, Mineola, Texas, July 18: The program o! the loca l church c alls ! or a meeting with George S. Benson b eginning October 19, a lectu r el!'hlp In midwinter and a combination Vacation Bible School and an evangelis tic meeting the first pa rt of n ext June. I am closing my first year with this East T exas cong r egation.
P rog r ess has b een made along all lines, In· cludlng the addition ot about thirty names to the church roll. 0. o. o . Newton, Royse City, T exas, July 16: We c losed a very s uc cessful meeting the night o! July 6th with L eon Savage of McKinney, T exa s , doing the preaching. Six souls were baptized Into Christ. Good crowds attended all services. To the Lord be all the pra is e.
Frank 'l'rn)'ler, Chaplain (Major) USAF, P . 0 . Box 207, Boerne, T exas, July 14: We had a s plendid a ttenda nce at Cha pel No. 4, Lackland, a t 2:00 P .M. y esterday. There were 166 pr esent, and six young men (airmen) w ere ba ptized last night at Boerne, and In addition a !lne P res byterian woman who h BJ! b een In attendance a few w eek s was ba ptized the "same hour."
Elmer H. lrb:v, Hanka mer, T exas, July 20 : Brother Jim Dobbs o! J efferson Street church In San Antonio clos ed a meeting h ere on July 2; two baptized and two r estored.
One was ba ptized just b efo re t he meeting making a t ot a l o! five being added t o the churc h h er e. Brothe r Dobbs Is n ot only a good prea ch er but he Is als o a n e xcellent personal work er.
Olnude A, Guild, 2701 E. Belknap Stre et, F ort Worth 11, T exa s , July lG: The past six mon t hs ot t his year have b een e n couraging a t R iver s ide. Two hundred and five ponded to the Invitation d uring this ped of time a nd our t otal budge t for the ..,,:c months ' per iod was $31,004 .15. T he a r c hitec t has f ur n is h ed plans !or our propos ed new chur ch b uilding on N. E. 28th Str e et.
from t he city and some from various states.
We began our radio program las t weelt to continue each w eek. It Is over KGAN, 1230
kc. , Thursday, 7:0& P.M. Pray !or our success In the gospeL Cl )'dc v. !loore, 5(6 Western Aveaue, Toledo, Ohio: Since las t report ther e have been three addition s h e re at W estern Avenue--
two by transfer of membe r ship and one ba ptism. The church h ere sponsored me In a meeting at Bradner, Ohio, June 16-
26, which r esulted In five additions-four ret~ torati ons and one baptism.
H. 0. DeDJion, Mount Julie t, T ennessee, July 14: The church a t Leevllle has jus t c losed a very s uccessful meeting. Brother Athens Clay Pulllas did the prea ching , and Brother Raymond Wa lker, a student of Da;vld Lipscomb, led the s on g s ervice. T en per sons w er e baptized and two restored.
This meeting has g reatly s treng th ened the con g r egation h ere.
Clnrence c. Gobbel, 1157 E . Ma be l Street, T ucs on, Arizo na , July 14: Our firs t two Su ndays In the work h e re g oes w ell, w ith above a verage In att enda nce , In terest, and cont r ibution s. VIs itors to this c ity a r e Invited to attend se rvices at Ma be l and San t a.
Rita congregation w h er e you w ill n ev er be a s t ranger. P lease notify me o! any Jiving hero th a t you know o!, w ho ma y not be In r eg ula r attendance at services a nywh e r e.
J. ·r. llcOiong , Tomball, T exas , July 15:
The w ork in Tomba ll Is g oing a long wi t~ enthus iasm and a g r a dual g r owth In the a ttenda nce of bo th the Bible class and the wo r s hip services. We have baptized s even a nd had t hr ee to co nfess w r o'1 S'S r ece ntly.
Frank R. Kilbourne, 10129 Palestine, T omball is to have a city s ew er s ys t em soon Hous t .:>n 15, T exas: Brother L. R. W ilson And as soon as this needed Improveme n t Is was with us at Jacin to Ci ty In a meeting In th e r e w ill be some h o us ing pr oj ects r ecently. The prea c hing was powerful. s ta r ted In our community which will g ive E ight per sons obe yed the gosp el, one was t he church a n opportunity to grow more r estor ed, and the 'church s treng the n ed. We a nd fas t er.
enjoyed our assoc ia tion w ith Brother WI!-
son and w e a r e looking f orwa rd to a r etu rn engagement n ext June.
l'nnl Dutte r fl e ld, Neenah, W iscon s in, July 15: W e have ha d two ba ptisms t he pas t month. Things a re w ell h er e. Bible s tudy l' nul Foutz, 111 Avenu e K , Sweetwate r, and wor ship service have a b out t he same T exa s , July 14: Br o t her Marde ll L y nch of att enda nce. Sunday nig h t a n d Wed nes day !'ecos , Texas, recent ly closed a v ery fine nig h ts a re a l so w e ll attended. Con tributions meeting with the Lamar Ch u r ch of Chris t. :> re nbove normal. W e are In the p rocess The preaching was excellent and th e church of r a i sing money to move t he build ing from was g reatly e di!i ed. The re w er e nine r e - Oneida , which was g iven to us by · the Hig hsponses with five b eing b a ptized. Since land A venue church In Abilen e, T exa s. H la s t r eport, I have assis t ed In two g osp el you know o r any Chris tians In this p art etl ngs In w hich 26 were baptized and r e - o r the cou ntry send me their addresses. Box Jr e d. These w ere w i th the T haye r oon-, 109, N eena h , W iscon s in.
Jnn~e. w. Re:vnold,., Pueblo, Colorado, July 12: The Vacation Bible School ot tbe Broadway & Orman Church o! Christ was the larges t that w e have e ver had with 512 b eing enrolled. Ther e w er e over 300 In regular att enda nce with a. grea t part of this s chool being those who are non-members . Brother J. B. Cox did a fine job :with the singing, and Brother Glenn E. Green of Color ado Springs had an exceptional Interest Jn t he adult class.
Clarence A.. Price. Bryson, Texas, July 19: Our s ummer meeting clos ed Thursday night with one to pla ce membership, and twe lve ba ptized. This makes a t o ta l o!
thir t y-six b a ptis ms In n early three y ears tha t I h a ve been h er e. Brot her Joe W.
L a ird o! Marlow, Okla homa, did a. Cine job o! preaching. The w riter dir e cted t he sin gIng.
Our Vaca tion Bible Sc hool with an enrollme n t of 119 was h eld a t the same time. Br other Laird certa inly Is a s plendid pr each er to work with.
R<> )' Henderson, Box 299, McCr or y, Arkans a s , July 15: I preached In a meeting in ~cCo mb , Okla homa, which c losed July 10;
two ba ptized. This f ind s me In a meeting In Hig den, Arkans a s . My n ext mee t ing, J uly 28-Augus t 6, will be with the Colony congrega tion, B ee Br a nch, Arkansas. Spring meclings co nducte d w er e : McCrory, Arkansas ; Grays , Ar k ansa s ; Br inkley, Arkansas; Des At•lt, Ark a nsas; Wy nn , Arkansas, and Banne r, Arkansa s . The work Is good In :OlcCr o r y. 'Vhen In our t own, see us.
E . JC Gray, 2212 Princeton street, WichIta F a lls, T exas, July 17: Ou r s ummer me etIng at 23rd and Grace Streets In W ichita F a lls, has j us t been concluded. The preachIng was d one by Ross W. Dye, minis t er of t he Mid-W est City cong r egation In Oklahoma City . I w ou ld !I ke to say to my b r ethr en everywhe r e, tha t Bro the r Dye, a lthough a young ma n in year s, Is a n outs tanding minister of the gosp el. H is sermons a re t rue t o the Script ur es a nd h e d ellvers th em with eloque nce a nd powe r . You ma ke no mistak e when y ou call Brother Dye for your meetings.
Page Ten J. Emmett WnJnwrf&h t. 547 East Walnut Avenue, El Segundo, california, J uly 16:
Three baptisms- at Central in Long Beach.
My s pecial courses, with the Central congreg a tl9n e xtended almost 15 months, with interes t and profit, and connection has b een sever ed In orde r to assis t other groups elsewher e. Augus t thrpugh October Is to be spent on the coast; and the first week In November with the Furman-Staples group In Corpus Christl where Brother Simmons Is a busy man according to the e lde rs.
Other app oin tments In T exas, following Corpus Christl, under consideration.
D. D. Woody, Little Rock, Arkansas, July 8: From June 22 throug h July the church at Springfield, T ennessee, conducted a series of meetings In w hich I did the preachIng.
Brother Paul Brown, of Lewisburg, Tennessee, directed the s inging, a nd Brother Allen Klllom, t'he local evangelist for the congregation, direc t ed the meetings. The weather was very' hot, but the a ttendance was good. Two were baptized. I am now engaged In a s imilar meeting with the Chestnut Ridge church, near Fayetteville, Tennessee. I am being ably assis ted by the leaders ot the congregation and Brother Paul P hillips, their young eva n gelis t. I grf next to Alamo, T ennessee.
P. D. Wilmeth, 808 Ha.mvasy Lane, Tyler, Texas, July 17: The writer concluded a most Interesting meeting with the Man hattan congregation In New York on Jul y 3
with good Interest and sustained en thusiasm up to the very las t. Some Cine contacts were made during the meeting, one was baptized and one r estored. Brother Edwin Rasco did an acceptable job of preaching here at home during my absence.
The work at Glenwood Is on the march.
Two were added by membership last Sunday.
My n ext meeting w111 be with the Springtown church, Augus t 1-10. When In Tyler, worship with us at Glenwood congregation.
Arnold Hnrdln, Lancaster, Texas , July 16:
We have jus t concluded a tine meeting In FIRM FOUNDATION I finish the work with the congregatl.:>n a t Bovina, T exas, In Aug ust. It the~e should be a working cong r egation wanting a preacher whose heart Is set on doing th<>
will of God, a nd who spends time d oing personal work, please contact me, G. Dudley Stout, Phone 2931, Box 422, Bovina, T e xas.
If a congregation Is not familiar with mil and my work, I will furn ish adequate Information, and can furnish r ecomm e ndatio n ~
by the con gregation her11 a nd well k nown gospe l preachers. May God bless the Firm Foundation ~n Its great work ot furthering the kingdom, with Its round the world gospe l news.
Jll, n. Phillips, VIctoria, Texas, July 17:
Just closed a good mee ting In Columbus , Indiana, with about seven baptis ms. I learned to love the fine fo lks In India na .
It was my firs t meeting In the state. I look forward to r eturn there, the Lord willIng.
I a m to be In Lake Victor, T exas, July 18-27. We should be ha ppy to have you In services there It you can come durIng that time. The work h ere Is a happy o u e. We have fine officers to work under a nd w e are glad to r eport that they love the truth and s ta nd by the preaching of it. When In VIctoria, v isit us at 907 North Camerae Street.
Roy L. Foutz, 1614 Bak er Street, Nacogdoches, Texas, June 16: I began work with the Mound and Starr congregation h ere on June 8. This Is a very tine congregation, a nd Prosp ects are good for Its future.
Geor g e T. Jones, now of Vernon, T ex as, preoeded me In the work here and was hig hly s uccessful In his accom plishme n ts.
In r ecent months, I have done the preachIng In meetings In Neosho, Missouri ; Sixth and Arlington In Lawton, Oklahoma ; Midland Boulevard In Ft. Smith, Arkansas; and In Sapulpa , Okla homa. My next meeting wKl be In Chattanooga, Oklahoma, beginning on August 11.
A. E. Flntll~y. P. 0 . . Box 403, Refugio.
T exas, July 16: Our w ork In R e fugio Is still bearing fruit a nd everyone Is happy.
It was reported some time ago tnat the church here had some Internal trouble. We want to say that the trouble was settlccl before we took the work h e re. This W!!S due to the untiring efforts of Brother R. D.
Simmons of Corpus Christl and Brother Harvey Garrett of VIctoria. This accou nts f(ll' our progress. Brother Harvey Garrett I~ now filling In f or Brother Snyder of VIctoria, who Is Ill, at Charco, and Is d oing a good work. Brother R. D. Simmons speaks over KWBU from Monday througn Friday at 7:15 p.m. This Is a tine program and every one should tune ln.
Tuesday, July 29, h_ ...
had n ot the holidays caught us. Of the number enrolled 151 w ere from non-chu rchgoing o r d enominational families: Baptist 9; Catholic 22; Christian Science 2; Congreg a tiona! 3; Episcopal 2; Greek Orthodox 4;
:\1ormon 1; Lutheran 16; Methodist 7; Nond enominational 1; Presbyterian 5; SeventhDay Adventis t 1; United Brethren 1;
"Protes tant" 8; a nd, "no church" 69. We plan follow-up work on these. Marvin Hastings Is proving a good co-worker as associate minis te r. I am p r esently In a fine meeting with the Lone Oak church in Paducah, K entuc ky . Will close meeting W ednesday eve n ing.
J uck Jllurrny, Van Alstyne, Texas, July 21: The Va n Alstyne Church of Christ Is Interest ed In securing a fuH-time preacher.
Those Interested, contact me at Box ~
Va n Als tyne, T exas.
Je,.,.. Hnll, Box 401, Paducah, Kentucky, July 22: Sunday night we closed a good meeting In Blanco, T ex as. B rother Raymond DeSpain n ow lives In Blanco and Is getting off to a g ood start with the brethren there.
Five w ere baptized dur ing the meeting and the crowds w e re large from the very beginn ing of the meeting. J ess Hall, Jr., led the s inging for the meeting and we were asked to r eturn for another meeting In 1953. This w ill be my fourth meeting with t he Blanco br ethren. I b egin a meeting In Brownwood, T ex as, this Friday night.
J. Roy WnJdrum, Box 419, Big Lake, Texa s , July 1: Yesterday brought to a close th ree years' of e njoyable and profitable work for the church In Fort S tockton, Texa s . T he brethren cooperated In a very commendable way for the realization of our obj ec tives In the building program. No sma ll church In the brotherhood has accomplis h ed more than was realized there.
Some of the b est people In the church are found there. The last few services resulted In t h r ee baptisms and one restoration. T he future of the wor k h ere Is very promising and a ll look forward to a good work.
Felix w. Tnrbet, 2681>--20-th Street, San Pablo, Ca ll(lbrnla, July 18: Since last r eport I have h eld meetings at Laramie, Wyoming, a nd Fowler, Colorado. Two w er e baptiz ed at Lara mie where Brother J ohn Franklin Is the able located evangelist. I gave up the work In Casper In May and then moved to San Pablo, h er e In the San Fra ncisco Ba y Area, to labor with the San Pa~ church on June 29th. F our h ave been t - ~
tlzed and one r estored In my work h , Brothe r Allan Van Is now la boring with . which Brother Foy E. Wallace, Jr., did the preaching. Finer preaching I've never heard.
T here were three responses and the church greatly s trengthen ed. We are exceeding our number on the membership lis t rather ofte n, In Bible study. There were 239 las t Sunday. I begin a meeting In Summerville, Penns ylva nia, the firs t of August. We are Into our fourth y ear of work and rejoice that about 280 people have accepted the call to duty In those three yea r s ' wor k together h er e. It Is encourag ing and yet we do s o little with what God has given to us. I could perhaps assist In a meeting this fall, If you n eed a preacher.
J. P. ''VIIJintn~~, Route 11, Box 198, Fort the Cas per church, a nd from all reports 'W1orth, Texas, July 15: We have been In Is doing a fine work. I am to begin a two meetings si nce last r eport. One a t Val- meeting at Davenport, Nebraska, on Au- Thontn8 F. Shrop11hlre, Box 155, McLean, ley Mills, T exas, with one baptism; and one gust 3rd.
Texas , July 14: The work In the McLean at J oshua, Texas, with four baptisms.
church Is g oing along nicely. L ast Friday Brother Morris Moore and Brother J ack night brought to a ctose the first T op-0- Glasg ow serve as ministers for these two Texas Sing ing Normal. Much good was ac- fine congregations, and both proved to be comp!ls hed In the way of development of excellent co-labor e rs. Seven have been bapthose who attended for better service In tlzed here at Lake Worth s ince our last song leading, etc. Sever a l states were rep- r e port. This congregation Is willing to r esented and quite a numb'er of Texas con- senti me anywhere In the United States for gregatlons. The work of the Instruc tors a mission meeting and bear the expenses of was excellent and we hope to have them the same . Anyo ne d esiring help In this manback n ext year for the 1953 session of the ner will please contact us at the above adsinging normal, June 15th throu g h 26th. dress.
They are: Tllllt S. T eddlle, Palmer Wheeler and George Saunders. We have a gospel meeti ng sch eduled In McLean, August 3- 10.
Bro the r J. M. Glllpatrlck of Pampa will do the pre ac hln~ and Brother Bob Fish will direct the s inging.
J, , Arnold Wnt11on, 7350 Chase, Dearbor n, Michiga n, July 14: Our vaca tion Bible school at Dearborn set a n all-time record of 266
e nrolled and an average dally attend a nce of 187. The latter would have been higher Wllllnm D. Kug ltn, Jr., 500 Highland Avenue, Caruther sville, Missouri: I have been In a good meeting with the church In Winnfield, Louisia na. The outs iders, as well as the member s of the church, manifested a wonderful Interest by their presence. The chur ch In Winnfield Is now doing better than it has during Its history. It Is In a difficult fi eld but In spite of Its ha rdships s uffe red It Is now on the road to progress.
This advancement Is due to the fafthful b r ethr en who have labored so hard. It t h er e is a ny con g r egation who would like to enter In some mission work, In the state of Louisia na, t his would be a wonderful opportunity for you to help In the spreading of the gospel In th is field. You ~
contact B. A. Schoomer, 309 Park Stree ·tuesday, July 29, 1952
Glenn E. Green. 1402 W . Colorado Avenue.
Colorado Springs, Color a do, July 6: We closed our Vacation Bible School and m eetIng.
J. B. Cox of Murray, K entucky, had c harg-e of tho ~:~ ln g ln g for both school and meeting and none can do It bett er. Jam ~
W. R eynolds of Pueblo , Colorado, taught the adult class and preached a t night. Six were baptized and one r es tored. Tho attenda nce w as the best In the his tory of this congregation.
J. L. Cnlven, Box 684, H enry e tta, Oklahoma..
Jl:!IY 17: On Monday night I t-egan with the church In Fort Gibson, Oklahoma, for ten nights, with J. D. Armstrong of Muskogee, Okla homa, leading the s inging, and he Ia doing a fine j ob. We are having a full house at e very service. I will beg in at Pleasant Valley on August 4 for ten nig hts , d then will be with the church In Jay, dahoma, fo r t en nights la ter In Augus t.
Our work Is moving a long in a very good way h ere, con s idering the hot w eathe r and vacations. When you come this way, stop and worship with us. We have many visItors as our b uilding Is just one block oft the highway and in the center of the city.
n. C. 1\IcCnrley, San Angelo, T exas, July 20; On the 16th or July, I closed a good meeting w ith the Lindale congregatl'on In Houston wh er e I formerly lived and l'abored.
Ther-e was a fine Interest, exce llent crowds, and tl(teen r esponses to t he Invitation, eleven or which were baptisms. Brother R.
J. Stevens, minis t er !or the congregation, Is one of the best song leaders we have In the brotherh ood. Our song services wore most Inspiring. During my absence Brother Lloyd Rico of Carlsbad, T exas, preached for us o ne Sunday, and Brother D. H . Hadwin of Abile ne p r eached for us the other Sunday. The Santa Rita congregation will give som e financ ial a ssis tance to Brother Hadwin In his efforts In Uraguay. The Santa Rita congregation In enj oying Its bes t year In Its entire history. W h en In San Ange lo, worship w ith us on the corner of Colorado and J ack son.
James w. ReTJtoldH, 135 Vernon Place, Pueblo, Colorad o, July 18 : The meeting, In which I had a part, with the 1402 W.
Pikes Peak Ch u rch of Christ In Colorado Springs, and a lso at the same time h e lped In the Vacation Bible School, was a s uccess.
The largest enrollment and r egular attendance ever to b e had was during this effort. The Interest In t he gospel meeting was certainly manifested by the large a u-
•ences and seven were baptized. Brothe r lenn E. Green has done a tine job with the West Pikes Peak church as local evangelist.
The singing during the meeting and Vacation Bible School was directed by Brother J. B. Cox In a f ine mann er. Tho meeting at Rocky Ford came to a c lose W ednesday nig ht, July 16, with a ll r ecords In a ttendance bei ng broke n. Several nig hts the people could not get Into the h ouse and had to turn away. The cooperation of the brethren In the Arkansas Va lley was exceedingly fi ne especially from P u eb lo a nd La Junta.
C. E . lllcGnughe:r, 2407 W. Lincoln, Springfield, Missouri, July 16: At Springfield, Oregon, nine w ere baptized a nd t hree restor-ed.
The e ncampme n t at Milwa ukee, Oregon, conducted by the Central church In Portland, with the fine cooperation of the con gregations of that nroa, r esulted In 12 baptisms, three comln ~ from the Chri s tian churc h, a long with three othe r confessions o f ~ongs. About !\50 s igned the r egister as avlng attended the en campment and many others cnme who did not register. About FIRM FOUNDATION 30 preachers l~ttend ed part of the time. The cause In Oregon has made great progress the last ten y ears, and Is destined for ev en greater things. L. D. W ebb Is the preacher a t Central and Is a lso doing a g r eat work with the Columbia B ible S~hool. He, a long with the oth er faithful preachers of that section, are to be commended for their zeal t or the L o rd. It was a n Inspiration to be with them. Ch o ice L. Bryant or Salem, led the s ing ing In a fine way.
E. W. Stovnll, 1203 So. Green St., Glasgow, Kentucky, July 16: Our m eeting at Huntington, T e nnessee, came to a close Wednesday night, July 9. Ther e were twelve baptisms a nd one r es toration as a result of the meeting. Sever a l others were almost persuaded to obey the Lord. The church seem ed to be greatly encouraged to stand solidly tor the whole truth. I indeed e njoyed th is m eeting with the good church . there. Brother E. Lacy Porte r begins work there In August. Ther e was o ne r estoration to the !alth h e re while I was away In my m eeting. W e a re now In our Vacation Bible School with a very fine attenda nce. We are In our third day and each day we have a la rger att endance. I am to be In Newbern, T ennessee, beginning the fourth L ord's day. This Is my second visit the re with the church. We a r e :praying for a good meeting. Roy Cogdill will be with us August 22 !or our summer meeting. When passing this way, stop and visit with us.
J. WJUnrd 1\lorrow, 2203 Azle Avenue, N.
F ort Worth, T exas, July 17: It has been several months since I h avil made a r eport of the work at Rosen Heights and In the gospel meetings In towns and communltius round about. There have been quite a number of :people to obey the gospel of Christ IP local work and gospel preaching In r egions beyond. We arc In the 28th g011pal 1ceetlng for t his y ear; preaching this week In Ired e ll, Texas. Last week a t Va lley VIew there were two r estorations and tour baptisms.
The church at Rosen Heights prop oses to h elp In preaching the gospel o!
Christ som ewh er e every n ight. On Augu11t 11- 16, It w ill be my privilege to do the preaching In a. gospel meeting three miles wes t of Stephenville--not tar !rom th e place of my birth. The church In S t ephenville Is sponsoring this great gospel eff ort. Considerable advertising Is to be d on e and the meeting Is to be held In the open air. L..'lrge crowds a r e expected to attend. We are prayIng that the greatest amount of good po!ls lble w ill be accomplished. lllore will b e said concerning this gospel meeting !rom now until the meeting begin s. We solicit t h e prayers of every Christian.
Tfce Elk:lrul, Alam ogordo, New Mexico, July 15: The purpose of this lett er Is, that w e des ire to contact a preacher between the age of twenty-five and fifty years of age w ith a view or employing one for local work with t h e church h ere In Alamogordo.
This writer has liv ed In this c ity and labored with this congregation for twentys ix years, and am worn out with toll a nd not able to do the worlc needed here any more. I am also pas t the ago of hard work.
We want a man with a family, even though It may be only a. wife and two or three c hildren. A wife who will and can h elp her husband In his work. We want a man who can and w ill attend to his own work and be w illing that t he eld ers attend to theirs, but w e can assure the preacher of the fullest coop e ration In every good thing , with no Interfe r ence In his worlc within gospel limita tions. It Inte r est ed, write t h e eld ers of Ninth and T exas Avenue church, P. 0. Box 31, Alamogordo, NQw Mel:ico, and g ive us Page Eleven a n approximate Idea of the s uppor t you will require. We will answer every question you want to ask. We will wa nt r e f eren ces from you, and assure you that we will give sam e. We wan t a man without even one little hobby. The reason for a change In our working force Is none other than my own physical h a ndicaps. Since we have In our city a n "Anti-SS." congregation, be sur e to a ddress us as s hown a bove.
Eugene A. PJttH, Natchez, Mississippi, July 8: I am In a m eeting with the church In Roxie, Mississipp i. I go n ext to Corinth.
The wor k In Natchez m oves a long nicely.
The church recently pur chased a p r pacher's home. This will enable us to have five more class rooms by using t h e apartment formerly occupied as llving quarters."
CccU D. Donthltt, P. 0. Box 67, Brownwood, T exas, July 14: One was baptl:>:ed and o n e placed membership at South Slda church h e re yesterday.
BROOKLYN, NEW YORK CHURCH OF CHRIST 800 St. Mark• Avenue DrooklTJl 13, Nen• York WILLIAM N. FRYE&-EYantJel .. t ROGER W. HA.,VLEY- EYIID&'ellat Sunday-10:00 A.M. and 6100 p ,JII.
Wednesday-7:00 P.M.
Phonet PRuldeDt 4-4'738
B11i1t in Texas CHURCH FURNITURE Pews-Pulpit Furniture. Opera Folding Chairs Quotations Without Obligations L. L. SAMS&SONS Waco, Texas OHUROH FURNITURE Pe-ws-Chancel Combination Sunday School Opera Chairs Folding Chairs FORREST DUNLAP PUBLIC SEATING CO.
RI-8595 2008 Jackson Dallas, Texas GR~t;GS EOIIIPI\lENT l'O.
Bel ton, Te xa s Page Twelve Oliver 0. Cunningham, 1331 E. 11th, Shawnee, Oklahoma, July 14: One has come trom the Christian church. Perry Cotham will preach In East Main's t a ll meeting.
George Tipps, 211 W. Grand, Jackson, T ennessee, July H: One restored at Highland yesterday. Our Bible study attendance has slumped somewhat, but other services continue at a high level ot Interest.
A. R. Holt on, Kansas City, Missouri, July 15: Plan your vacation to Include the Blue Ridge camp meeting, Blue Ridge, North Car.
ollna, August 23-29. Write J. W. Bre nt>~, W1lodmont Blvd., Nashville, Tennessee. 0 . K. Alexander, Box 203, Alvara do, Texas, July 18: Atter preaching about three months tor various congregations In Iowa I plan to return soon to my headquarters In Te"*la. I have some time !or gospel meetings and am also In position to consider located work. It 1 can h elp you, write me.
Edwin Love, 109 W. Norris Street, El Campo, T exas, July 15: A one week meetIng was recently closed In El Campo durIng which there were two baptisms and two res torations. Everett Ferguson and Dale Hunt were the preacher and song leader, respectively. Both are local young men and are seniors In Abilene Christian College. This was the greatest meeting that El Campo has !Wer had with respect to number s . Brother Ferguson did a commendable job of preaching the gospel. He .~~ -oW--A ~~~ ~ l ::::-:: ·\~< J 1 ~ ' .. (J "" ~ '1-' t ~. '.9c. ft F\\\~" • ~. ~
IOUND ECONOMICAL EXPEDITIOUS IROADWA Y PLAi-f CHURCH FINANCE J. S. BRACEWELL Director 1408 Sterling Buildin1 Houston, Texa1 FIRM· FOUNDATION is now on a European tour where he will be a speak er at the Frankfort lectureship on July 18. We are expecting to support a tu11 time preacher by September 1. The opportunities a re ma ny In th is area.
Choice L. Br,·nnt, 165 South 15t h Street, Salem, Oregon, July 15: I am to assist in the Payette Lakes encampment (McCa11, Idaho), July 26-August 2. Brother L. Arnold ·watson w ill s erve as evange list and I shall teach singing c lasses and direc t the s ong se rvices during the campaign. One baptism In Salem recently.
lo3"1ln Cook, Box 155, Booneville, Arkansas, July 18: Brother Reese Bryant preached In our summer meeting, with good interest beIng manifes ted by ail. We set new records for attendance and contribution. One wa~ baptized and o ne res tored. One was restored at the Sanatorium last week. I shall begin a meeting at Golden City July 21.
Don C. Bentley, 7519 Greenville Street, Houston 20, Texas, July H: The church In Humble , Texas, Is Interested In locating a young minister who Is talented at working with young p eople. Those who might be lnteret~ted should write to Brother F. H.
Bogs, Box 456, or Brother F. F. Francis, Route 1, Box 50. Both addresses a r e Humble, T exas.
Ro~<s llleredfth, Elgin Texas, July 15: The Elgin church just completed Its best meetIn~>
In h is tory with capacity crowds o! E l gin visitors. Three were baptized, two res tored, . two placed membership with the congregation. Brother James LeFan o!
T emple was the wonderful preacher !or this meeting. This brings to nineteen the number baptized th is y ear , plus !our restorations and !ive placing membership.
Paluser Wheeler, P. 0. Box 109, ~emphls, T exas, Ju ly 11: Just closed the Urst sess ion of the North Texas Music Normal at McLean, T exas, with a full house. The enrollment was 172 with much Interest during the entire time. They plan the second session next year to begin June 15 and end the 26th. Tllllt S. Teddlle, George Sa unders and Palmer Wheeler were the teache.
r s. It more inter est Is manifested, another teacher will be added next year.
R eu el Lenunons, Cleburne, Texas, July 20: A short, one Sunday meeting at Walcott, Arkansas, just concluded, resulted in several baptisms and restorations and the es tablishment of a new congregation of some 46 member s. Roy Greenway, Route 4, Paragould, Arkansas, an elder in the Souths ide church in Paragould, and who 1--::~;·;~;·;;;;~~~~:=::~·-·,r Tel. 2514
MANUFACTURERS Highest Quality Church Furniture Direct dealing with churches. A ll kinds or church furniture sold on positive guarantee. The many Churches of Chris t which have purchased churc h furniture from u s will testify to the quality or our work and the reasonableness of our prices . It w ill be a pleasure to give any information which you may want concerning your church furniture needs.
WRITE OR CALL JOHN W. HEDGE 686 100KAPOO STREET JACKSONVILLE, TEXAS TEL. 8621
• - a-a_ a _o_ a_a_~_a_u _a_~_ o _ o_~_ c _ •:•
Tuesday, July 29, 1,95z Jives at Walcott will worship with the new congregation and be one o! its leaderB.
Brethren built a nice. tile building wholely by fa ith before the meeting w as held. The groundwork for the nwe congregation was well laid, and they have a splendid future.
Che1<ter M. H ill, Box 11, McGregor, Texas, July 21: Our meeting with Thomas McDona ld came to a close last night with one being baptized. The c rowds were good. A.
n ew record was set for day services. Brother :\lcDonald did a wonderful job of present the truth In pow er and love. I will start a meeti ng at Prairie Hill, Texas, tonight.
VIsit us ~hen In McGregor .
WIIIIH G. J e rnigan, H01 Ash Street, Commerce, Texas , July 21: The work h ere COI}o;., tlnu es In a very fine way. Three were be 1
tlzed and one Ide ntified yesterday. Sche._
uled future meetings Include next spring, Br other E. W. McMillan, Southwestern Chris tian College, and Brother B. C. Gilodpasture, editor, Gos pe l Advocate, t a ll of 1953.
Mau rice M. Howell, 3425-13th Avenue, North, Birmingham 4, Alabama, July 15: Tbe meeting with the congregation in Russellville, Alatiama, resulted In eight' baptisms and two r estorations. Brother Herschel l!l.
Patton Is their good evange11st. My next meeting will be with the Berry, Alabama.
churc h. The work at Central Is pleasant.
·we have just rece ntly air-conditioned our complete building.
Ebb RJ:tndol, MulE'shoe, T exas: Brot her Denton Thompson recently conducted a ver y splendid singing school !or the church her e.
He Is a good teac her and we enjoye<l It very much and recommend h im to any one who neede a school. Brother Thompson preaches for the church at Lazbuddie.
Brother Norman Gipson ot Grand Prairie begins a meeting for the church h er e July 28 through August 7th. All within this area plan to visit u s during this meeting.
Earl E. Smith, 6 Cole Road Place, Prescott, Arka nsas, July 17: The ten-day meetIng in which I preached at Evening- Shade, six miles t<outh of Hope, Arka n sas, closed last night with two baptisms. Interest was good throughout. We are not having a summer slump h ere In Prescott as r egular contribution!! and Bible study attendance are a t an all time high even when the preacher is away In meetings. VIs it with us when traveling Hiway 67 through Arlr.
a nsas. Large highway s igns ide ntify us.
Ira Y. Rice, Sr., 1107 W. Eufala Street, Norman, Oklahoma, July 16: I recently closed a gospel meeting In Watonga, Oklahoma, with a nd for th e sma ll g roup there.
North Side church in Oklahoma City sponsored the meeting. VIs ible res ults of the meeting w e re two ba ptisms , one of whom h a d been a Ba ptis t for quite some time. I am sche duled to preach at Stone wall, Oklahoma, n ex t Lord's day a ls o, the 27th. Success to the d ear old Firm Foundation and its s taff.
Floyd J. Splvy, Box 141, Colorado City, T exas, July 19 : The t rouble in North Little R ock w as se ttl ed on June 15th when those involve d ma d e their confessions of wro ng . The church there 10hould ha ve a good f uture . On July 8, I moved to Colorado City. The prospects are g ood for a profitable work. One placed member s hip on July 12.
I b egin a meeting at Plea sant Va lley, Tenn essee, July 27 th and a t Greenwood, Ten nessee, Aug u s t 3rd.
_aesday, July 29, 1952
CONGREGATION FSTA B LISHED liiARVELL, AR KANSAS The ·w est H elena, Ar kansas, church tool< the lead In establishing a congregation at Marvell, Arkansas. T h e m eet i ng b e g a n on Sunday night, J une 29, and r a n throug h July 10. I n t e r es t was good through out.
About 300 attended th e firs t ser v ice. For the twelve n ights the a t tenda nce a v e raged abou t 275. The re was a B ible class fo r the c hildren each ni g h t befo re t he s ermon which averaged 55. The beginning of this work was made poss ible by West H e le na sen ding the ir preacher, Doyle Banta, ; Proc- FIRM FOUNDATI ON f ine meeting. One baptism thus fa r . Not long ago I baptized a very f ine ma n a t Lannlus whe re I h a ve been p r eaching two Sundays each mon t h . T his unit ed ano the r family in the ho use of God. lt Is o u r des ire to t a k e up local w ork w it h some congregation that w a nts to work !or t he cause about Sep temb er 1, after our m ee tings have com e t o a c lose. It you d esir e our services plea s e write me at the a b o ve address . May t he good Lord contin u e to bless B ro t h er S h owalter a nd his s taff In p r ocla iming t he gos p e l t hrou g h th e good old F irm F o unda tion.
t er Str e et of Port Ar t hur, T exas , sending \Vt•nch•ll W l n k lc r , Box 133, Rayvi lle, th eir singer, Prest on Nelson ; a nd t h e neigh- L oullsla na, J uly 16: One was r estor·ed I:J bornlng churc h e!< of Ch r is t supporting th " R a yville dur·lng Tu n e. The mectln gat Good meeting with th e ir presence and f ina n ces . s p r ings, Ala bama , closed w ith six baptism s.
During the me e tin g nine teen w e r e r·e- Mel vin P. Ste l)hens p r each es th e r e. T h er e r ed, fo urteen of t h em com ing from t h e we re t h ree b n ptlsms a n d f ive restorations ls lla n c hur c h. About f itly y ears ago dur·l ng t he m t•e tlng a t Oak Gro ve ln ' Va lke r , .. e ch urch In )la n·e ll we n t d ig ressive. Du r- County, Ala ba ma. Bro ther Johnny Nicho las ing tha t t ime ma ny m em b ers moved to I pro:a c hes the r e. 'Ve are off to a good s t a rt Marvell and s ince t h e r e was n o loyal co n - h_e re In Rayvi lle In a meeting with exce pg r egatlon the y w en t t o t h e Ch r is tia n ch u r c h . tr o n a lly la rge c rowds--one b a ptism a nd o n ~
W e we re gla d t o s e e s o many come bact< r t'!lto ra llo n. 'Ve begin at Tra nsylvanll.
home. Loul>< la na, J uly 27th.
F ift een w ent from the 'Vest H e le n -:t c hurch to m nkc u p thl ~ n ew wor k. All o f th ese live In a nd a r·ound :.\Iarvpll, so it r elie ved the c r owded condition at 'Vest H ;; le na and h elped Marve l l. 'rhe r·e were a lso s ome fr·om th e Coffey , Cy pe r t a nd L a Gra nge cong r <;galions who ll\·ed In a)Ir·vc ll, so t h ey are a part o f the n ew work \Vc 11ow ha ,•e 45 members ltncl pr·os p ccts lool< b righ t for ma ny mor e. 'rlH> f ir s t Sunday fo ll ow ing the meellng the re we re 55 f or c lasses, 65 for· assemb ly wo r·shlp :tnd a b out the same n u mb er for· the night scr·,•lce. T he Ma r ve l ;
b r ethren nrc n ow making pla ns to b uy o r e r ect :t b uilding. Diff e r ent brethr·en w ill p rea ch In ) l,r vc ll u n ti l a f u ll time ma r: can be suppo rted.
Fltzh u:::h J•; tllnl'.-tou , P. 0. Box 144, E ver g r .-.,n, Alaha ma, J u ly 12 : On June 1, I began r egula r wo r k with th e c hurch In Eve r g r e e n.
i had pr·ench ed n earl y th r ee years fo r t he c hur·ch in ) fo ulton, Ala ba ma . D uring our stay ther·» a $25,000 b uilding was e r ec ted with less than on e-foul'th or that a mo unt unpa irl, :1 lso a n a dclltlon to the p r each e r·'s h o mo. T'tJacu a nd ha r·mony p r e va il and some o f God's f inest c hildren a r·e t he r e. The re wen: fou r· ba p tisms d u r·lng our r·ec en t mpetir.
lg h er·~: with \V. '"· "\Vtllts. One wns bnptrzNl dur ing our ·Ialit m idweek c lnss a n d <>n t: Indy, a Baptis t a nd a lso p ia nis t o( t h o: Bc\JHist chur·c h. was ba pti zed during a rec · Ill lll t .-ting Sl!Jl pOr t ed by the ChUrCh h e r e .
J ohn T. Smllh, 2519 Colgate Lu bbock 'ro:x- , . L. Hn'·" " itllllcr, Sa n Anto nl<o 93. Col.
a s, J uly 15: Lubbock's ne,~·est grou~, the ::'\n po l .,s . ;\l e x lco 18, D. F., :.\lcxlco, July ll :
9 uns e t con g r e ga tion has jus t c losed a g ood Th., ch urch o r Ch r is t In Mexico City, l!a:;
m eeting In which H~bert Arant a nd I s e r·ved l u ow b een meeting r egularly f or one Year.
as song leader anQ preach e r. F ive were As we h~\'e no c hurc h h o use, the meet ings baptized o ne r estor ed f ro m t h e e rrors of · arc In prva tu ho mes, a nd mus t con tinue :.>o the Chr,ls tla n c h u rch a nd three a dded by l n n t ll a b uild ing can be boug h t , f or Mex membe r s h lp. This con g r egation Is n ow lea n la w fo rbids us ing a r ented h a ll or composed of f ifty -seven d ev out s ouls. They a udl tor·tum fo r r e lig io us s erv ices. Ther e own t h e ir lo t on th e c or n e r of 34th a n d ar·e n ow f' lg ht memb e rs of Spanish s peec h.
Memphis, and 'the ir tempor a ry building, a nd with good prl)s pect!i fo r mo r e soo n. Du ~are _p lnn n lng a nd worki ng t o e r ect a pe r ·
manent building In a ve r y s h o r t time.
A. R. Pe r k huo, H 7 Welch Str ee t, Den to n, Texas, July 14 : We had a g ood da y yest e rday at the W elch Str eet Ch u r ch of Chris t, t o n, T exas. Brother a nd Sis t er J . S .
Page Thirteen lng this summer , the r e a r e s even American members living h e r e, b u t m ost will be gone by the end of August. We earnes)ly solicit Infor ma tio n about a ny oth er membe rs of the church w ho may be living h e r e n ow, a nd also a bou t a n y w ho may p lan to v isit t h is Cap ita l. Our r ecently la unc h ed build Ing f u n d Is now n ea r ing the two h undred dolla r ma r k . T he preacher, Agus tin G.
Fig u eroa L ., s p ea k s bo th English and Spa nIs h , a nd ser vices a re In both la n g uages.
His ma ll a ddre ss Is A pn rta do 24818, Adme n. 59, ) [exlco, D. F. His r esid en ce Is a t Calle Man za n lllo 40, A p t. 3, Co lonia Roma, S ur, Mexico City. He will r ead ily s upply de t a ils to t hose w ho wish to Inq u ire.
C. J. ~fuH><ey , 105 H:lynes Ave nue, San Ant onto, T exas: J u s t closed n two Sunday m eeting a t Wae lde r, T exas, w h e re my bro t her, W. A., p r ea c h es. T he Lord h as o n ly a f ew fa ithfu l souls t h ere. T hey have a ,·cry n ice m eeting house. Many of ou r g o od preach e rs have h eld m ee tin gs t he r e.
:\Iy meetln{:' brough t n o vis ible r esul ts. A good n umber from o ther c h u r ch es ca me out to hear , a nd Imp r essed us as b e ing In s earch of t h e t r uth . "'\'\' e a ll Ce lt that m uch good was do ne and ou r la b or was n ot In va in.
r was ln ,·l ted to be with th em again. I a m prea ching fo r the church in Potee t , T exa s. I can h old two o r t hree meetings th iH fa ll.
I•'. F. t r rmu :IN, Houte I, Box 50, Humble , 'l'ex a:;, P ho ne 3G2,V;! : '¥e, o f Humble, T exas, a r·e of u nfo r·tuna tc c i rc umsta n ces, as our p r each e r had to leave v e ry s uddenly on a cc oun t o r bad hea lth . ( '"'e would l ike a man who has b een active w i th young people to tak e up the wo rk. Anyone Inte r es ted may con e spond with me 1m media t e ly.
COllll'IJUNION B READ !>On SALE W e keeD on hand regularly a s upply ot Cresh, pure u n leavened bread tor communion purpose s. Eleven wate rs to t he small carton and t h ree ot t hese cartons to the lar•er car ton- a ll carefully s ealed so It w ill keep ln dettnltoly. Every congregation s hould have on hand a good supply at all times. Price: Ullr re car t on ... each , 12.36, poatpald.
ll'lraa ll'oandatlon Pabllalalar Bo118e Aaatta, T exaa • ter of Phoe nix , Arizo na, a ls o Na ncy Keele, le t It be known t hat t h ey wan ted t o work with t h is g r ou p o f Chris tia ns by plac Ing th e ir membe r 11h lp with u s . The L ord'3
work In Den t on Is g rowing. \Ve ha ve thro>e fine cong r egatio ns (white ). a nd one color ed. "The Churc h ell o f Chris t Sal u te Y ;,u" with a 30-mlnute b r oadcast o f the gospe l over the local s tation , KDNT, each L o r d's da>· morn ing. It Is our prayer that Gotl will con tinue to b less the church wh e r e ve r It may be.
J •• R. Lo-.·e tnd7, H on ey Grove, T exas, J u ly 19: I jus t closed a v e ry fine a nd enjoy a ble meeting a t Ch e r ok ee, T exas. Ch e r okee Is about as largo n con g r e g a tion as you will Clnd In any rura l community. Most o f th em have a mind to g o o nward In the Lorn's s e rvice. The re was o nly one baptis m, but great Inte r est was ma n if es t ed throughout t h e meeting. Brothe r W eldon Kir by was our s p le ndid song lead e r . H e did his part with g r eat satis factio n . I am at present INTERESTING STORIES * BIBLE LESSONS -tc PUBLISHED ESPECI ALLY FOR BOYS AND GIRLS BY h t h e Dodd C ity c hurch, with Brothe~ Andrews In what looks like a v ery • THE CANADIAN CHRISTIAN PUBLISHERS •
D A. SINCLAIR, EDITOR . BOX 700. THOROLD, ONTARIO, CANADA 0 ENCLOSED IS $1.00 FOR ONE YEAR 0 PLEASE SEND A SAMPLE To NAME ____________________ _
ADDRESS--------------------------------------
Page Fourteen BANISTER. AT I!IAST TEXAS STATE TEACHERS COL LEGE Wlllla G. J e rnigan It bas been a n nounced by D r . James Gee, president or East Texas State College, Comme r ce, Texas, that the baccalaureate sermon for the summer graduating class will be preache d on August 17 by Brother John H.
Banister, minister o! the Skillman Avenue Church o! Christ, Dallas, Texas. Brother Banister will preach at the regular morning service o! the Commerce congregation on that day befoce d llllvering the commen cement sermon. A large number o! students are expected to r eceive degrees in both the ~rraduate and undergraduate levels.
SOUTH WEST CHUR CH OF CHIUST 2304 West 1-"'th Street B lue Islan d, IIUnoiJt We are sending you, and the many other fri ends o! this congregation, Important Inf ormation for all who are Interested In New T estament Christianity In the Ch icago area.
You have !mown u s tor many years as the 'Vnshlngton Heights Church of Christ. As w e have not worshipped In the Washington Heights area !or some time, the name has been legally changed to "Southwest Church ot Christ."
In accordance with the state law, trustees have been appointed from among the elders and deacons. We have purchased a very nice building located one mile south or our last meeting p lace. T his Is at 2304
West 120th Str eet, Blue I s la n d, Illlonls; jus t one block south o! the Chicago c ity limits, In a f ine n eig h borh ood , near good transportation. Blue Island Is a city of 16,000 people , and has n ever had a. New T estament church . There are a lso several adjoining c ities w i t hout t he true c hurch.
The opportu n ity t o do good here Is t r emendous!
Our group Is small, and t he ex pense of getting star ted In t his new location Is heavy. We are hoping you, our friends, will wish to help u s. Most o! you know that, through the years, we have always been FIRM FOUNDATIO N liberal with our limited tlna nces In helpIng others to get started, and In s preading the gospel In various locations, far and near. 'Ve have done this, rather than build a fund which would have taken care of our present need. We will send you addi tio nal Information It you desire It, and will gladly answer any questions concerning our work here. Any help given will be appr e ciated very much, and we sincerely promise to put forth every e!!ort to use any assistance you may give us In a way well pleas ing to God.-Willlam Vermillion, secr eta•·y of u·ustees, 5740 Wes t 22 Place, Cicero 50, Illinois.
PLE~SA~T GROVE CHURCH OF C~T L loyd E . E llis Since I am planning to move to Abilene, T exas, on July 31st to assume my duties as bus iness supervisor for the Christian ChronIcle Publishing Company, there will be only one more mailing of THE BUILDER.
If you have not had the opportunity o!
coming to the Pleasant Grove Church of Chris t, I trust that you may be able to vlslt with us during the remaining two weeks of my stay here.
It you have come and found It pleasant here, I trust that you may continue to come and work with this group of Christians, and If you have only visited a few times I hope that we may have the pleasure of seeing you again before I leave.
l\Iy work In Pleasant Grove has been very pleasant and I have only regretted that my editorial work on the Gospel Treaaure Graded Bible L essons has prevented me !rom visiting In the homes ot the people more.
I r ejoiced with the congregation In t hat the building Is about finished and that the congregation has grown so much. Our B Ible s tudy c lasses have greatly Increased and a l r eady some of the r ooms are full.
Will each of you Invite someone to come with you during the next two weeks?
And If you happen to r eceive this note and have not yet attended our meetings, may we have the pleasure of seeing you before we have to move?
THE T RI UMP HANT JESUS By L R. WILSON, President Ce ntral Christian College DELIVERY -DATE NOW SET FOR AUGUST 2
This NEW BOO[< is " brim- full" of mate ria l which ma)' be used in a practical wayin every day life'.
It also cuts the ground f rom under the Modernists ond shows conclusively that J esus is the Christ, the Son of God.
~an be easily READ,. yet it can and will be STUDIED minutely by thoughtful students.
This is a ve ry bea utiful book, containing 265 pages, set in 12-point type, on high quality paper, bound in De luxe ve llum, a nd stamped in gold.
After August 2 it will sell for $3.00.
All orders post-marked on or before August 2 will be accepted at the prepublication price of $2.
Send your order at once to: MRS. L. R. WilSON 1520 Johnstone Bartlesville, Oklahoma Tuesday, July 29, 1~
TO WHOM IT MAY CONCERN: Brother Clod E. Wallace has labored w llh this consregation for n early three years, but has decided to aecept work with the church at Marie tta, Oklahoma. We sustain a great loss In his going ror he has done a g reat work In preaching the gospel In this city, and living a life t hat Is consistent with the gospel which he preaches. Tha church has grown In a r emarkable ma nner during this time, and he has caused no trouble at all In our mids t. He leaves us with the good will of the church and the city. He and Bill Thompson have been coworkers during this time, and they have made a strong, united team.
When Brother 'Vallace had an opportunity to go to Marietta In 1951, we Insisted that he remain with u s. Again presented 'lllth this opportunity this year, he decided to go.
Brother a nd Sister Wallace are "acquainted with grief" but "the eternal God Is t' dwelling place, and underneath are the erlastlng arms." Despite the advers ities o!
ll!e their faith Is yet firm, and their hearts pure. We bid them Godspeed as they co from us.
(Signed) F. B. Thompson, M. S. Bills, R. L. Stanaland, Elders of the Fourth and Groesbeck Church, Lufkin, Texas.
V. :'If. Gllbert, 1913 Franklin Avenue, Des Moines 14, Iowa, July 18: lt has been several months s ince I have had a report In the Firm Foundation. I o.m now getting started In to the last halt or the year 1952
by being engaged In a protracted meeting with the chur ch In J erusalem, Ohio. This Is to be my 6th meeting with this congregation.
We are experiencing some very bot weathe r, however the attendance to star t the meeting ott Is better t han expected. We are now r eady for the Hh night of the meeting and we hope we may have a good one. My fi rst meeting of this year was with the Cass, Indiana church and continued over three Lord's days. VIs ible r esults were seven baptisms and two placing membership. Basket dinner and three servIces for the las t day of the meeting w ith 16 congregations represented along with 16
preachers and t en song leade rs present.
Next meeting was with Pearl, Illinois. Good attendance, good singing. an exceptionally good meeting in many ways, but no visible res ults such as baptisms. I then spent several weeks ou t In the Pacific Northwest In meetings with Yak ima, Walla Walla, Spokane, and Pine City, Washington. The Yakima. meeting was of three L ord's days' duration with good Interest and attendance.
Five baptisms and two confessed wroi!_P.
Four preaching brethren visited the rr~ lng and a numbe r of congregations ' ~
r ep r esented. July 6th was spent with Redline, Iowa; one baptism. I first preached tor this congregation whe n I was a boy and s till In school. At this place Is whel'e I me t my wife and In this same meeting house we wer e married September 22, 1916.
July 13, I was with "Indian Creek" near Hamburg, Illinois. Basket dinner w ith three services and two baptisms. May God bless tho preaching of his word; may the church prosper and grow, both In numbers and spiritual strength. I enjoy reading the many good r eports "From The Harvest Fie ld." Some good teaching bas b een appearing In the editorials o! Brothe r Showa lter. I love to r ead what he writes.
Dunvood Boggtt, 612 Baird Street, Cleburne, T exas, July 21 : I did the preaching In a meeting at Oakwood, Texas. There were three baptisms. The church there seems to be awake and busy serving the Lord.
'luesdey, July 29, 1952 FIRM FOUNDATION Advice About College Dr. F. W. Motto:t Dear High School Graduate: May I hove a few moments of your time? I hove a message which I om sure will be of urgent interest to you. It may even affect your future life. We both ore deeply concerned about that futwre.
Many young persons ore making the mistake of deciding to take a job instead of planning to go to college this fall. This is tragic because young people, who hod planned to go to college, often accept a "temporary" job and find the present income so pleasant they never give it up. This means they are accepting the alluring present and a secondJrate future instead of investing their time and effort in a college education that can train them for a successful career.
Each year we have more calls for teachers, preachers, and business leaders than we can fill. These calls are for people with college training and leadership ability.
These positions cannot be filled by high school graduates. But they can be filled by these same graduates if they will develop their talents in college.
If you ore now interested in college, let us tell you of the opportunities at Harding College.
It is a Christian college dedicated to the physical, mental, and spiritual development of young people. The new buildings and equipment ore second to none. The faculty is adequately prepared to teach you and keen!)< interested in you.
We shall be glad to send you additional infannation and assist you in any possible way to obtain your college education. I' ll be happy ~r you to write me at the address below: DR. F. W. MATrOX Director of Admissions HARDING COLLEGE Searcy, Arkansas Page Fifteen Page Sixteen FIRM FOUNDATION Tuesday, July 29, 1 ~
ANNOUNCING 12 DAYS AUGUST 25TH WRITE IMMEDIATELY FOR APPLIGATION BLANKS.
ADDRESS: s w s s 3014
SKILLMAN AVE.
DALLAS, TEX.
CLASSES MEET 9 AM-4:30PM AND 7:30-9:30 PM THE FIRST ANNUAL SESSION OF THE SOUTHWESTERN SINGING SCHOOL The Skillman Avenue Church of Christ, Dallas, Texas is furnishing its facilities free of charge for the use of this school.
THROIJG!i SEPTEMBER 6TH J I *STUDENTS:
*COURSES: All men an<;l women, boys and girls from age ten upward. §
F undamentals of Music, Sigh t Singing, Conducting, HymnolQgy, §
Hymn Appreciation, Harmony, Vocal Methods, Choral Tee}].- §
niques, Special Problems, and Choral Work. §
*FAOULTY:
*SPECIAL COURSES:
*SPECIAL TEACHERS:
*COST:
*FACILITIES-:
*CER'NFICATES: BiU Davis, B.M., M.M., former ACC t eacher; Thomas F. Sullivan, Senior Music Student at SMU, Associate Minist er of Skillman Avenue Ch urch of Christ in t he field of Music and Bible ;
Richard Palm, B.M., Music faculty of ACC beginning next fall ;
Kenneth Davis, Jr., B.M., M.M., (one year on PhD.~, song leader and Bible teacher at the P earl and Bryan Church of Christ.
Training course for women Bible class teachers in methods · for use in song training for children.
Virginia Walker, BA., Dallas Public School Teacher and Bible class teacher; Mary Freiley, B.M., M.M., former Dallas Public School music teacher (now in Ft. Worth). 1. Tuition $15.00 over 13 (just slightly more than $1.00 ~r day). $10.00 for age 13 and under. 2. Room rent in Christian homes approximately $10.00 (13 days). 3. Money for meals (some homes will serve breakfast), noon meals served in the city park (across street from church) at low cost if desired.
New air-conditioned Skillman Avenue church building, beautiful city park for recreatiOJa, and Christian homes to stay in.
Will be issued for satisfactorily completed courses.
This program is carried on by the above faculty of individual Christians and is heartily endorsed by the churches from which they come.
§